Okay, okay, [I uploaded the world](http://www.mediafire.com/?q1c7wired53kc69).
Oh, the irony. Active Climbing is my friend's gym. We should totally set up a time to hang out or go climbing or something, but only if you promise not to laugh at my first time climbing! You can laugh the second time. Fair game then. Do tell, what sort of issues do you see with whether or not we should be creating artificial minion bacteria to do our bidding? Genuinely curious about a genetics major's opinion.
My cheeks are hairy. They'd probably be even more hairy if I didn't wear clothes that tended to rub the hair off. 
Well, it's been done twice already, first in 07, second time last year. I think the throwing of the dead Shark (period) was stupid, regardless of tradition. It has no meaning.   To me, it was a waste of resources (time, money, planning) and not very funny. If the goal was to 'tweak' the noses of Wings fans, I think it just made them laugh at stupid Sharks fans, which there are fewer than in the past, but usually it's ignorance to the game of hockey and not pure stupidity.   Some people don't find Aqua Teen Hunger Force funny, or South Park. It's the same thing to me. Lowest common denominator stuff.
You know what you keep avoiding? Your birth certificate. I think its time we saw it. Dont you?  I want proof that you're not an alien, after all, you keep defending aliens, its only natural for some of us to start asking questions.
The Republicans want to crush the middle class while they get wealthy.
Upvote for reminding me I have money in the pants I wore yesterday. THANK YOU! :D
Taco supreme with beans no meat. So good. 
Break me off a piece of that fancy feast!
reminds me of "spanish harlem" - mamas and the papas
I usually get paranoid when I'm high..... just smoked and have no paranoia.  This is rare for me so I'm going to love it while it lasts!
I wonder why.
Actually it was surprisingly comfortable experience. It's a point and click adventure so you just tap things and occasionally battle with an attack and defend button. Ive played lots is iPhone games and this is by far the most suitable game for the platform.
hit me
I personally like Napalm Death's "From Enslavement To Obliteration" for getting back at noisy neighbours like you.
There was a possible macroburst touch down in Randolph, NJ on Gristmill Road.  I think it was mostly property damage.
If you're not Einstein you suck go die in a hole.
I'm surprised at how many people don't know the meaning of these words. It's good to see someone else who does. I've had people argue with me that that is the wrong way to use them regardless of how many dictionary or Wikipedia links I would give them. I personally am an agnostic theist. I would disagree with you about there not being gnostic atheists as I have met some although far less often than any of the other three types.
He's climbing in your windows
I think this was our physics computers's background back in 96
Like that part up there where it says tvtropes in the link?    &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Eventually, even if it takes 1000 years, Israel will lose a war.  Then they'll have to atone for all the evil things they've done.  I'd prefer they make peace now before that happens.
You, sir, are a master tactician.
[Tim and Eric](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nh3K2J99YHo)
I consider myself quite the lurker also. [Proof](http://imgur.com/F2p6x)
Stirrups and an iPod. I will die happy knowing that I fucked with the heads of many, many archaeologists.
Unfortunately I can't answer those questions because they are way too general. Chess is much more concrete game than you perceive  my advice would be to concentrate on tactiscs more than on strategy. My grandmother's name was indeed Sonya:)
Nice!  I do find these race reports interesting, and hope to see more on r/velo.  I'm curious to know how amateur racing works in Denmark, you have Cat D, C, B, &amp; A, as well as 2?  Good pic, also.
Have sex with men.
No major differences. I'm assuming you're using a ubuntu-based mint (as opposed to the debian flavors), so it's essentially ubuntu with multimedia codecs and flash enabled out of the box. Mint also comes packaged with a few Mint-only utilities such as the Mint menu and Mint's own Update manager (both of which are terrific). But under all this minty goodness is still very much ubuntu, most help you find on the ubuntu forums will be perfectly applicable to Mint, for example.  Hope this helps!
IRL sudo.
maybe it would be best to say 'in business' rather than 'the rich'. in business, you dont want your competitors to know your assets because it may give them a competitive edge. 
1. Not entirely sure, to be honest. My best guess is 3-6 =P  2. She sits there and stares at me for long periods of time. I think she may have picked up on the fact that her food comes from me, but I still haven't worked up the courage to try touching her without gloves or anything (again, sensitive to bug venom)  3. An exotic pet store near where I live. Make sure that the store is legit and that the guy you buy from can tell you where it came from etcetera because scorpions are getting over hunted and captive bred is best (I know this sounds weird since he didn't tell me it was pregnant).  4. Very, very easy. I have had an easier time keeping Zoidberg than I have with fish or hamsters. They eat once every 2-3 days, and the only other complicated part is keeping the temperature humidity at the correct levels. I live in Georgia, so perhaps this is easier for me than others =P
perfect this is exactly what i wanted to know. so my question is if i just keep the humidity at 70 for twelve and then drop it to 30 for twelve. and re peat tthe process with this deal with the spider mites thoroughly.
If the OP has anything against people with bad taste and no sense of humor, what the fuck is he doing on reddit?
We've thought about that, actually. It will continue to be a thought, but if we decide to make one you'll bet your ass it'll be up here.
WHAT
The problem with coding experiments is that no one other than the 'coder' knows what experiment is what. In my lab I followed a post-doctoral researcher who used to code all his experiments, he was a scatter-brained individual who left poor records and if he knew what the key to his code was he certainly didn't share it with anyone else. When he left the lab he didn't leave any details of his codes. Whole boxes of samples and work were thrown out, experiments had to redone, collaborators were extremely pissed off because no one had any idea what he did.  You sound like you have you're head screwed on right and coding for your purposes (similar reagent names etc.) makes sense. I would say just make sure someone (like your PI) knows what your code is (or where the key to it is). Just so someone can follow your work if you end up leaving your lab.
i've never seen an asian that looked yellow but i've seen plenty of white people that looked white in the way that many black people look black...
Ummm..... a lot.
[In English.](http://translate.google.com/translate?js=n&amp;prev=_t&amp;hl=en&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;layout=2&amp;eotf=1&amp;sl=auto&amp;tl=en&amp;u=http%3A%2F%2Fthebrainbar.blogspot.com%2F2011%2F02%2Fillustrationen-von-clayton-ryder-crain.html)
I couldn't help but scream "HIYAAWWWWWWWWWWW" when I watched this...yes, thats correct...all those w's included
You are a grandparent!  They are beautiful.  Congratulations.
The end-goal is a happier, more productive country, not higher tax revenues.
We're dancing because the ads are CONVENIENT!
Dude, I don't think you get it. The whole point of the Bing toolbar or the Google Toolbar, is to help the search engine rank pages by using its users as human ranking engines. It's based on what you CLICK on. Say you go to stackoverflow.com and search for "multithreaded php" and you CLICK ON result X. The toolbars report home to the motherships that "Hey, when searching for 'multithreaded php,' X is a super relevant URL."  Since the toolbar has this feature (when you search a site for something, noting which result you choose), it would be idiotic for them to go around blacklisting certain sites like google.com -- in effect saying "the links people click when searching on google.com have no bearing on relevance." Google is just like any other website with a search field. And also, when a user uses the Bing toolbar and searches Google, I believe that only the URL(s) the user clicks is used as data. The toolbar figures all other links on the page are probably not as relevant as the one the user chose.  Google purposely "polluted" the Bing toolbar's reporting data, you might say, by manufacturing fake results and CLICKING ON THEM with the Bing Toolbar. They could have achieved the exact same effect by making up a random website called "xzxcvzxcvvvd.us" that featured a search field and returned their bogus, unrelated results.  Conclusion: "bing copied google" is a line for fanbois who only read the sensationalist headline. "bing gives weight to links that it knows people clicked on when searching on other sites. other sites include competitors" is an accurate picture of what happened.
Steven Merchant Jr. at your door step! 
Yeah dude it's so fucking 90's. 
It would be awesome if 10-20% of those who intended to vote liberal swing their vote to the NDP. At least they would get rid of the conservatives and the libs dont stand a chance now anyway its almost a throw away vote at this point. 
I honestly have no idea, but It would probably take quite a while, they are remarkably tough aircraft.  You'd have a lot of warning signs to ignore before something went catastrophically wrong in the air due to lack of maintenance.  
Length: 6.75" from abdomen to tip, across the top.  Girth: 1.75" average width, 1.9" at the widest, 1.6" at the thinnest, circumference of 5.5".  Now you.  Remember to measure from the top, not the underside, for length.
Pro-tip: Put your laundry basket right underneath the opening to the washer. Then you can just dump everything in at once, nothing falls. Same goes for the dryer. Laundry light speed.
My favorite thing about this video is that it is called Easter Jam 2011
See what you did there was create a false necessary equivalence.   Semi-benevolent but very much quasi-evil corporation cares about money, so it creates low-paying jobs for non-essential personnel. Everything else is incidental, and more reflective the socio-cultural climate of the nation state in which said quasi-evil corporation places its facilities than anything to do with the quasi-evil corporation itself.   Also, last time I checked Palo Alto was not for want of high-paying jobs occupied by people of color.
Read it as a Christian would then read it as "we" would. 
Beat me to it......
i couldn't give a fuck if i look less cool than those guidos from YOUR point of view. I'm European and the way I see it, those fuckers represent the end of everything I loved about American culture in the 90s... starting with what happened with MTV and ending with Jersey Whore(s). The life style they promote is not something the majority of you should aim for. Good luck with looking up to them cause they "get mad pussy"... "son".
In my university, except engenieering, that is mostly males, all is dominated by women. 
slept like a baby [](/awyeah)
...... I knew it.
There's a difference between writing a mod for a platform you don't own and writing a mod whose code you may not really own, legally speaking.  Notch allows this sort of stuff to go on, but it's a gray area, legally, as to who even owns the copyright to the mods themselves (and is likely to vary significantly from mod to mod). To say nothing of the fact that U.S.-based modders have to violate the DMCA just to create them.  I tend to think if someone doesn't want their mod in a pack, you don't put their mod in a pack, but I also think getting uppity about "your" mod that might not even be "yours" is pretty silly.
When one installs Mumble boot up and follow the tutorial. Then go to *server* -&gt; *connect*  Then click *Add New...*  Label: &lt;anything goes here&gt;  Address: virtualgnu.go-beyond.org  Port: 64738  Username: &lt;Jartipper or whatever you want&gt;  Click *Ok*. Then click *connect*.
General Field: Meteorology  Specific Fields: Atmospheric Dynamics (ie, not statistics or climate variability, though I am passionate about the Climate Change debate!)  Research Interests: tropical cyclogenesis, severe local storms &amp; tornadoes  I'm only getting my MS currently, but I teach a lab course and really love explaining concepts to interested laypeople.  
Theater?
Webcomics count? I got some good ones for you.  Here's the bulk of my infamous list but in no particular order:   [Adventures of  The Floating Elephant:](http://act-i-vate.com/23-1-1.comic) A very interesting story but very mysterious.   [Freak Angels:](http://www.freakangels.com/)almost steampunkish story of psychically powered twenty-something year olds surviving in post-apocalyptic London.  [Sin Titlu:](http://www.sintitulocomic.com/2007/06/17/page-01/) Another mystery story, very surreal.  [octopus pie:](http://www.octopuspie.com/) Slice of life cartoony comic of people living in New York.  [The Meek:](http://www.meekcomic.com/) Fantasy comic with the second best art in webcomics. Characters, style, and story are phenomenal. Still somewhat new though.  [Lackadaisy:](http://www.lackadaisycats.com/) A group of cool cats running a speakeasy in 1920's St. Louis. imo, the best art in webcomics, and quite funny too.  [Rice Boy, Order of Tales, and Vattu:](http://www.rice-boy.com/) There are three webcomics on this site. All by the same person, two of them finished, all of them high fantasy stories that take place in the same fictional world. The first is a little more surreal, the second has a much nicer story, and the third is still getting started so who knows (though it has the best art yet).  [Gunnerkrigg Court:](http://www.gunnerkrigg.com/index2.php) A strange scifi fantasy about a strange girl going to a strange school. Ignore any similarities to Harry Potter you may think it has in the beginning, and this will become one of your favorites I think.  [Zebra Girl:](http://zebragirl.net/) Fantasy about a girl who accidentally gets turned into a demon. Story starts out a little wacky  but gets progressively better and darker, both in story and in the actual artwork. You might even think the artist planned that. Winner of awards for best black and white art in webcomics, and the reason I like crosshatching so much.  [Dead Winter:](http://deadwinter.cc/) Best zombie webcomic hands down. Every so often the artist takes advantage of the digital medium with simple animations in the right some (you'd be amazed how well it works) and some less successful full page animations.   [The Abominable Charles Christopher:](http://horhaus.com/abominable/) The ongoing story of a silent bigfoot and his animal friends. It's really very good. Art is awesome too.   [Scary Go Round and Bad Machinery:](http://www.scarygoround.com/) Two comics on this site. First is about English college students solving mysteries with actual ghosts and stuff. Second comic is about English middle schoolers solving mysteries with ghosts and stuff.   [Questionable Content:](http://www.questionablecontent.net/) Slice of life ongoing comic. It's about robots, love, and indie rock.   [Boxer Hockey:](http://boxerhockey.fireball20xl.com/) Best sport ever invented.   [Girl Genius:](http://www.girlgeniusonline.com/comic.php) The steampunk webcomic. It's pretty good  at times and has been around for a while. I've got a few complaints for the art but it's decent at the least.  [Bear Nuts:](http://www.bearnutscomic.com/) Care Bears on crack. Story of a group of dysfunctional zoo animals.  [Nedroid Picture comics:](http://nedroid.com/) These guys are the spongebob and patrick of webcomics.  [he Adventures of Dr. McNinja:](http://drmcninja.com/) He's a doctor and also a ninja. It's like when you played with action figures  as a kid. It's pretty awesome.  [Johnny Wander:](http://www.johnnywander.com/) An auto-bio comic by a couple and their roommates living in New York. There are also a few short stories thrown in that are very nice.  [Wasted Talent:](http://www.wastedtalent.ca/) Another auto-bio about a girl working as an engineer in Canada. If you want to read back skip all the black and white pages, the ones she made in college aren't so good.  [Subnormality:](http://www.viruscomix.com/subnormality.html) I really don't know how to describe this one. Go ahead and read it and tell me if you can think of a description.  [Dawn Of Time:](http://www.dawnoftimecomics.com/index.php) Story of a stone age girl, her dinosaur, and her time traveling Victorian era friend.   [Gastrophobia:](http://www.gastrophobia.com/) A single Amazonian mother trying to raise a child in Ancient Greece.  [The thrilling Adventure of Lovelace and Babbage:](http://sydneypadua.com/2dgoggles/) Nevermind what I said about Girl Genius, this is my favorite steampunk webcomic.  [Jump Leads:](http://www.jump-leads.com/comic/) British scifi comic about two guys stuck hopping between alternate universes.   [Adventure of Superhero Girl:](http://superherogirladventures.blogspot.com/) Exactly how it sounds but at the same time different. Story of the daily life of a small time superhero, the actual crime fighting is all in the background.  [Cleopatra in Space:](http://www.cowshell.com/cleopatra/) Exactly how it sounds.   [Rat Fist:](http://ratfist.com/title/) It's like The Tick. Not sure what else to say.  EDIT: missed the comment about webcomics, sorry.
hit me
after the surgery she wotn have balls, therefor no gayness
in her ass.
Six days before you could see a doctor, that's fucked up.  I remember waiting the Easter long weekend to see a doctor, it was only 4 days and felt like an eternity.
Is that guy playing his scales with three fingers? wtf!
If Jesus was stuck on an island, he could just walk for help.
I thought he was standing on the edge of the portal to get the glitch to work? I must be getting it confused, I've never actually done any of the glitching because I've got no talent for it. Anyway, thanks for the correction.
Yeah, no DVD player ever had coax as its primary output.  Actually, I think that DVD players connected to coax did color shifting and such crap to prevent folks from recording DVDs to VHS.
BINGO!
I'm confused on how Global Agenda is the reason for new Tribes suckage. Clarification, please?
Had no idea such a thing existed, but coming from such a prestigious source as Police Academy I should have known better.
hey good job
I just made my first PiF thread and I´ve spent around 1~2 hours checking the profile of everyone who posted on it. Arduous work, but I think it was worth.  Have to agree with everything you said.  I think that new PiFers should follow a simple priority list when giving away games.  - The user have made a PiF before: if she/he havent received anything yet, she/he has even more priority.   - The user is cleary a potencial future PiF: people who say "hey, I dont have monies so please give me a free game" are almost saying that they dont plan to pay it forward, with some exceptions. Hope Im not sounding pretentious by saying this, since Im relatively new here.
i just pour a bit of salsa onto the underside of the cap and dip my chips into it
sudo aptitude install apache2 mysql php5 php5-mcrypt libapache2-mod-php5   JSIA
what this city needs is a better class of criminal...
That's a really tough one for me with what you have. I'll have to pass now but I probably won't get any offer I'm looking for so if I come back would you do DDRU3 for Split/Second?
[This is relevant](http://blog.mrmeyer.com/?p=4646). According to him, it's better to have fewer carts and more items. The time to transact a new customer is more significant than adding more items to the transaction.
It's not as bad as one of mine which said "angry lobotomized marmosets will circumcise you with rusty pliers."
I certainly don't believe our police, or most police for that matter, are inherently fascist, however I _am_ very concerned about how politicised they've become and about the links between _some_ elements of the police and groups like the EDL.  This isn't a new thing, particularly as regards the Met/SPG/TSG who have a long track record of [Nazi sympathies](http://www.thefirstpost.co.uk/62704,news-comment,news-politics,blair-peach-was-killed-by-policeman-says-report,2?lost=1).
No movie crushes, but I have two huge TV crushes:  Jim Halpert and Logan Echolls, I would kill to be with either of you.
Rosebud is his father.
Why a plant based diet? The benefits are huge while eating a diet of animals is harmful. Discover the health benefits of a plant based diet while you eat your way to excellent health.
it held a lamp.   lol
Best place you went?  How'd you get started with it and decide where to go?  I'm looking on starting something similar once I leave school (although maybe not on as long of a scale), is there any general advice that you'd have for someone like me who hasn't so much as left North America before?
Exactly.  If those children didn't want to be blown up, then they should have chosen a different mother to give birth to them.
A lot of people think that Atlus made Disgaea only because they published the first one here in the U.S..  Then again, a lot of people also think that Atlus made the Growlanser series because they published the first ones in Japan and Heritage of War over here, but they were still developed by a different company.  The whole "publisher vs. developer" thing gets kind of annoying with some companies like Atlus, where their developed games are similar to their published games as well.
Lets go back to the pic, does she look obese to you? Granted its not the best pic to judge on, but she hardly looks obese. In fact, if I had to judge on the pic alone, I would say she is attractive. 
If it says it has 0 carbs per serving and you like it, it's fine. Go forth and be maple-flavored.
You are doing it wrong
If you are in seattle and can find the NL#5 or the Cindy 99 those pwn chemdawg imo. I went to a despersnery the other day and they gave me a chemdawg j and dared me to smoke it all in one sitting...I came back and told them I did. They gave me another one! lol 
Arabic? You're very pretty.
knives chau
Katy Perry did a pretty good cover of your friends song.
Best? You assume people have witnessed multiple robberies and can therefore choose the *best* story? Where the fuck do you live?
Yes, exactly what I was getting at-- to believe that women aren't chained to the kitchen (or, well, to believe that we shouldn't be) is a feminist sentiment. 
Oh, and here is a fun [photoshop](http://i.imgur.com/rASCS.jpg) I did. Bet you can't tell what I did there, haha.
Egypt has lot's of shiny American hardware, too.
Well... honestly - you are your own person and you have a few paths to chose from here on out:  1) You can try and change her mind (say you're sorry, or confess your love even more) - which will continue to feed her distain for you.  2) You can completely and utterly cut off ALL contact from this point on. You will still feel feelings and what not, but do not give her the benefit of bringing you down anymore.   Take the second path. Choose to move on. Make her realize down the road that you haven't fawned over her like you were. See at this point she despises your attention - but once she realizes that you no longer even care about her enough to contact her at all, many thoughts will probably flood into her mind: "Hmm, did he find a new girl?"   There will other thoughts along the lines of why you are no longer contacting her. She will think that you've moved on and that if you were so into her then you must be doing great things because you're not even thinking about her.  Women like men who don't seem needy. They like men who pretend that they don't matter. Women like to work to get a males attention against other women because in their minds "if all of these chicks are into him, he's got something good going on and I want it, I want to make him mine."  If you're bugging her, she sees you as weak and desperate and pathetic. Just show her that she no longer matters to you by not contacting her. If you ever do see her again in person do not appease her, do not fawn over her. Give her nothing more than a brief glance, short "hey, later". Make her think that she is invisible to you. You are a man, and despite how many women will say this is untrue: you have a role to play in this GAME. It's a game, the dating game, the mating game. 
Seriously.  Each has its place.  I can't smoke while I'm eating.  But when I'm enjoying a meal, I reach for a drink.  When I work up a sweat after the gym or doing yardwork or just chilling out in the sun all day, I reach for a drink.  When it's time to celebrate, I want to uncork some wine.  And, when it's time to approach a girl, I gotta break the ice with a drink-- can't just say, "Hi, I'm BlackbeltJones, wanna come over and smoke weed?"
Lost that auction pretty fast bleh. Auctions are fast-paced and the trading post is ridiculous! 800k + Baby PB? Bah!
I love a happy ending
Every comment is about that carrot of a penis.
No food.
http://imgur.com/vq56c  Orginal
This is actually pretty cool haha
Thats not old. I'm only 23, and I remember when The Sims 1 came out. Heck, I remember when Sim City 2000 came out.
Because People Magazine is a very trust worthy publication.
But humans are predictable. Seriously throw a decoy grenade in black ops, everyone goes after it.
Natalie Portman has been the hottest babe out there for like 10 years running.
Oh boy. This is going to be fun.   First of all, most studies done that measure the sensitive of the penis only measure the sensitive of the glans. How can you measure penile sensitivity without measuring the whole penis? The only study of the kind ever produced that actually even looks at the foreskin is [this one.](http://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/10.1111/j.1464-410X.2006.06685.x/full)   It concludes that:   &gt;**The glans of the uncircumcised men had significantly lower mean (sem) pressure thresholds than that of the circumcised men, at 0.161 (0.078) g (P = 0.040) when controlled for age, location of measurement, type of underwear worn, and ethnicity. There were significant differences in pressure thresholds by location on the penis (P &lt; 0.001). The most sensitive location on the circumcised penis was the circumcision scar on the ventral surface. Five locations on the uncircumcised penis that are routinely removed at circumcision had lower pressure thresholds than the ventral scar of the circumcised penis.**  Here are some helpful images to illustrate the results of the above study:  [Intact](http://www.circumstitions.com/Images/sorrells-int.jpg)  vs.   [Circumcised](http://www.circumstitions.com/Images/sorrells-cut.jpg)  [This is the key to interpret the information](http://t2.gstatic.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcQRq0Z5xg4usAw1tsaMQ-vQyPGA0bOCbubaK5XpefLoilYydanZjQ)  As to the health risks of circumcision; the rate of complications is estimated to be anything from 5 to 10%, which is much higher than all of the conditions that can affect the intact penis. The severity of complications from circumcision can be anything from skin-adhesions to loss of the penis and even death.   [Here's a gallery of some examples of the ways that circumcision can go wrong](http://www.circumstitions.com/Restric/Botched1sb.html)
"nononononNONONONONO"
Also, the "no Atheists in foxholes" notion is complete nonsense.  I have family that served during WWII and Vietnam that can verify that they never found the need for God, no matter how horrible it got, and these are not isolated examples.
Just tried it in google.be it worked o.o
[](/megusta "slurp that stuff right up...")
Heh, was about to make a similar post, but already have mine set up and have posted in r/sanmarcos before.  If you haven't created it yet you might check out mine: minecraft.projectorion.info  info/maps/stats can be found at [projectorion](http://projectorion.info)
I agree
* Fleetwood Mac - The Chain * Goldfrapp - Strict Machine * Mozart - Serenade No 10 for winds * Don Mcleon - Vincent (Starry Starry Night)  And most of Muse.
Macgyver and a pack of matches.
He answers this a couple questions up.
Well, I find the searchability of the Market very awful.   With Appbrain you can search for what's popular pretty much by any country. You can see what's new, and what's hot.  Also the app-queueing on the website is nothing to be sneezed at.  In terms of features has the appbrain team beaten the google market team.  Also the app loads faster than the actual market app.
He will, I think, unless some other Republican steps to the plate and hits one to Far Right Field. The primary voters want someone to say, "Do not raise the debt ceiling! We are not responsible for this debt!" Of course, that would devastate the economy, but Obama would be blamed for that. Right now, all it takes to win the Republican nomination -- and if unemployment stays high, the White House -- is loads of money and complete disdain for the American people. Trump has both.
However, the general Irish one was fucking awful. People really can't understand us. 
It's not about arm size.   Power comes from technique. 
Correct. I'm going to need some more time to make it more awesome.
I'm hooked up to a highly experimental brain wave recording device that allows me to project my thoughts into an English equivalent. 
You hide your porn folder? Shit...
I hadn't read a single HP book though I took my kids to the first three movies. My youngest finally convinced me to read them - I started with the fourth because I pretty much knew the stuff from the early movies.   Holy cow. Awesome books. Start with the fourth, then decide if you want to read 1, 2 and 3.   Also, if you've seen the films, you really haven't been completely spoiled for the books.
Here's an article that might interest you: [In Norway start-ups say Ja to Socialism](http://www.inc.com/magazine/20110201/in-norway-start-ups-say-ja-to-socialism.html)  As to your question, perhaps because they're broke?
Looks like a pretty serious offense they brought on themselves.  If they're talented maybe further antics can cause martial law to be invoked.
WAAAAAAAAALLLLLLLTTTTTTTTTTTTTT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  wrong show?
Why a fork?
Always put the toilet seat down when I'm done :)
My favorite DS game after The World Ends With You.  There isn't anything that should be frustrating, as the gameplay is just solving mostly easy puzzles.   It is very, very story oriented though, so if that is a turn off, stay away.  It has been described as a visual novel before, but this is to the game's credit, as you will not be able to put this game down once you get going.
3 Gaddafi grandsons are also killed! 
where is the rage comic on the front page to go with this?
Lick the tip!
I can't verify this. lol.   I typed that message on my phone with predictive text enabled and I couldn't edit it after I had posted the message.
Mmmm the truckaccino.  Really wanted the frame in that color but alas all they make now is black and absurdly bright blue.  And don't worry, fenders &amp; Schwalbe Marathon Plus tires are on their way.
And due to massive popular demand, [I uploaded the world](http://www.mediafire.com/?q1c7wired53kc69).
It's not *that* old. There are still people running P4s.....
Better than being than turned on then flipped off.
No word on it yet but not likely from what the developers have said.
Asked them to hold the jizz. They did *NOT* hold the jizz! True story.
More uneducated sensationalism.  You must like Fox News.
The British newspaper "News of the World" released a report before Minogue was officially cast as Astrid, claiming the Minogue's character would in fact be a sexy Cyberwoman.
For me, personally, It'd have to be something in Pink Floyd's catalog. However, this guy's spin is fucking brilliant. If I could write like this, I'd have never failed a comp class.
I always thought the NPC's looked good but no matter what, my character's face looked like it was her main weapon in the war against rough concrete walls.
a hell of a drug.
no you should be deported, diablo negro
&gt;By the way, Scifi is not a setting, it's a genre.  Are you trying to say the dumbest things possible?  Of fucking course it's a genre, but it's also the setting.  A story with magic set in a magical island that has *no science* isn't a science fiction story.  It's a fantasy story.  Lost has more fantasy than Lord of the Rings.  I'm starting to remember why I gave you a tag with RES that says "Dumb as hell."  Turns out you're actually dumb as hell.
No one reads this comic because everyone is staring at those nipples ^^ 
Is this your only account?
It not a good thing *or* a bad thing. It's merely a fact that the "free market" will need to adjust to instead of complaining when the knife cuts the "wrong" way.   tl:dr: Deal with it. 
My friends and I skipped this. Now I don't regret it. Thanks for the quick review.
You logic amuses me. There are, on average, over 1000 tornadoes per year in the US, any one of which could kill someone. You need an earthquake large enough to bring down buildings for there to be any real risk to human life. How often do we have those, exactly? And as far as forecasting... are you really trying to say that we are better at spreading the word of an incoming earthquake than letting people know about impending tornadoes? We have an entire system of alarms and sirens used to notify people of tornadic threats. There is nothing even close for earthquakes. A single large earthquake would make the damage caused by these tornadoes, or any others, look like child's play. That isn't to downplay the damage from these storms, which is obviously immense. It's more about recognizing that the threat posed by a large earthquake is staggeringly large.   My overarching point here is that tornadoes do not "excel at ending human life." A very small percentage of tornadoes end up killing anyone. What happened a few days ago is statistically anomalous, which is part of what makes it so tragic. 
I like 09. In 2010+ they started including that comeback AI online, so if I was down 3-0 with 10 minutes remaining, I could shoot 3 times from the other side of the planet to tie it up.  Unfortunately, I can't play it anymore because EA sucks and disabled the online play.
Fucking hell.
Sidney from Alias!
It's all good. I didn't have any pre-weightloss jumping happily type pictures, so that's what I had to go with.
yep. Too bad it's apparently legal to purchase consumer information that was stolen.
File my nails. I just want them to be smooth!
There's no direct courses you can take, but there are some related fields of study which are beneficial. In particular, it helps to have a good foundation in logic, mathematics (especially [Game theory](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Game_theory), although a lot of universities and students mistakenly believe that this should be a course about video game concepts), programming (having a complete set of rules which don't crash or have unhandled exceptions), and probability. For pure communication skills, take a few composition courses, and a dash of general business classes couldn't hurt.  Beyond that, it might be helpful to study a bit of meme theory, if for no other reason than identifying the specific concepts which form a given game's structure (such as identifying Puerto Rico's influence on San Juan, and the primary differences between San Juan and Race for the Galaxy).
I joined there was nothing but griefers and trolls...
Luxray is based on a lion. Also several legendary pokemon are based on "actual legendary myths", just maybe not the ones you are used to.  Groudon, Kyogre, and Rayquaza are based on the hebrew myths of Behemoth, Leviathan, and Ziz, while Regis are based on golems.   Articuno is a Roc, Zapdos is a Native American Thunderbird, and Moltres is a Western Phoenix, while Ho-oh is an Eastern Phoenix. Raikou is a Raiju, Entei is a Chinese Guardian Lion, and Suicune is a Japanese Unicorn, and Lugia is ryujin. Celebi is a fairy, as are Uxie, Mespirit, and Azelf. Latios and Latias are aeons. Dialga and Palkia are Izanami and Izanagi. Darkrai is the Bookeyman. Arceus is the bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara. Kobalion, Terrakion, Virizion, and Keldeo are the Three Musketeers (not really mythical creatures but still). Victini is based on Nike. Tornadus, Thundurus, and Landorus are based on the Kami. Meloetta is a Muse. and finally, like half of them are Freaking Dragons!  Sorry. had to do vent there lol
You know, as bass ackwards as it seems, I would do anything to be there. Tornados, while terrifying, have a strange appeal.
[Hit yourself in the face with a block of wood.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yp_l5ntikaU)
I've never felt like a feminist, at all.  Generally I'm the type to hug and cuddle my man and then go make him a sandwich after cleaning up after him, just because.  Posts like that bother me sometimes if it's OMG!Extreme.  Otherwise I just shrug and go on to a different post, about shoes.  TwoX is still cool, it just is a very diverse conversation, just like it's members.
on the other hand... I always look forward to mow the part of the lawn that was invaded by my mint "experiment". Smells wonderful!
I was given a $350 jacket from Go fast Sports.
How do you figure hell is for-profit? It has no cash-influx, and a serious heating bill? Hell basicly is a giant excessive S&amp;M dungeon targeted at the wrong non paying demographic?
&gt;I don't think we've haven't had a war since '45.  If this is true...&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
As an expectant father, I can say that this is pretty good -- and I hope my wife will be the one to clean that poop off my daughter's neck because I don't think I want to do that.
good god. upvotes for pure unrelenting wtf.
another minor update, fixes an error and adds another torrent
This is not the newbie I am looking for.
Uhh, the entire point of snus is to gut... or have I been doing it wrong the entire time?!
Saw this ages ago on Gizmodo...
You guys seriously play on b.net?  D2 is a great game, but even it isn't great enough to be worth suffering with b.net to play it.  Why isn't anyone hosting a server?
I don't think Jesus would have supported a political system. Conservatives generally want fewer government social programs (but in my experience, don't seem to offer a solid alternative) and liberals want more government involvement but through taxation.  In case you couldn't catch it, I'm a form of anarchist, and I think Jesus would have been similar. Jesus wants people to take care of each other. He wants people to love.  Jesus wasn't a liberal or a conservative. He was a lover of people. Base your politics accordingly.
Unfortunately, our system is like the one they employ in the United States.
Surely you jest?
&gt;I think if people don't want to end up collateral damage they should not be in the same building as him.  Jeez hope Gaddafi doesn't enter a hospital!  &gt;If they'd actually managed to kill Gadaffi **no one would care about the other people that got killed** because the war would be over.  Hahahahahahahahaha that's fucking disgusting, and there's no way you can tell me the war will be over if he's dead.
And why wasn't I invited?
Military gas mask bag. Disqualified.
mmmmmm beverages
**Strawberry Margarita** * In a blender that can crush ice: Fill blender about halfway with ice Add 3/4 cup each of GOOD tequila and Triple Sec. Add juice of 3 limes Fill blender with FRESH strawberries. The more ripe they are (juicier) the better. Pulse blender to crush ice. Once ice is crushed run blender continuously until a desired consistency is achieved. I like mine slushy. This should yield four good sized drinks. Use this recipe as a baseline. Some like it with more tequila and less triple sec. If the strawberries aren't very sweet you might have to add sugar. I use powdered sugar or a simple syrup. Add these at the end after you've tasted it. If the strawberries are really sweet I up the lime juice. I like to use the lime zest from a few of the limes as well as this gives you all the lime flavour without the bitterness of the juice. I also add a couple pinches of salt to the ice. I find it helps break down the ice and it also helps to balance out the drink. You can rim the glasses with margarita salt or powdered sugar is nice too. Cheers!
&gt;... I never said a guy was better.  &gt;Wouldn't drag queens have a better understanding  Better than who?  Do drag queens know more about femininity than women?  Some maybe yes. But looking feminine without looking exaggerated I'm not to sure about.   You're stomping on the gas pedal when we only need to be going about 20mph.
Walk On - U2
Did you miss the part when Saif Gaddafi was recorded on video handing out weapons to mercenaries and telling them to attack protesters?  EDIT: Shit wait, we all just got fucked over. Saif Al-Islam was the one that was seen on TV and recorded giving guns to mercs. This is Saif AL-ARAB, AKA the one who DEFECTED TO THE ANTI-GADDAFI forces!!!!! http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saif_al-Arab_al-Gaddafi
When I created my first email account, legoman was taken.
Rory and a Fez ;)
Sniff everything before I eat/drink it.   Everything. 
Am I the only guy in the world that thinks this is wrong? Fucking wrong.
Thanks for the suggestion of posting on the Ubiquity forum – no idea why I didn't think of that.
his mustache doesn't even look like the one on the picture...
and a first class ticket from LAX to Japan is $6500, travel must be expensive!  **wrong approach.**  you need to choose your destinations wisely. rome and the rest of europe are an awful choice if you're traveling on a budget. why? the euro is slaughtering the dollar, this drives up the price to go to and be in europe (which is also why gas prices are rising, dollar is inflating = oil is priced in dollars = oil drives up cost of flights, anyway...).  want to travel outside of the country? birmingham alabama to cancun is $327. puerto rico is $428. jamaica is $453.  want to stay in the USA? birmingham alabama to miami florida is $237. denver colorado is $239. new york city is $255.  these tickets are on kayak. go to kayak.com/buzz or kayak.com/explore and see for yourself.  here's how you save up to travel if you're tight: create a new bill every month, it's called the travel fund. pay $100 a month into it, don't fuck off, take it seriously and treat it like a car payment or necessary service bill. at the end of the year, you'll have $1200. you can stay in hostels for $15/night around cancun, and eat at taco stands for $2-4 a meal. even if you lived 'well' for a budget traveler, you'd be spending about $35/day which is enough to stay a full month traveling around the east coast of mexico. yea, you might not have all the amenities of the first world, but who gives a shit, [this is your scenery so i think you can deal with a few salty showers](http://i.imgur.com/Qotkn.jpg).  if you still think traveling is expensive, you're just looking for an excuse to not go anywhere.   ps: birmingham (bha) to rome (fco) is $879, but regardless of the price i wouldnt recommend going there.
&gt;RTD   &gt;subtle  :O
UN-AMERICAAAAA, FUCK YEA!!
Damn, I was hoping for an awesome new video.
Wow, those look really really nice. I wish my regular painting looked as good as your speed painting.
Get it written in a foreign language and then visit that country.  Insist that it says "I only speak English."
"Here, hold my beer" and "Hey! Watch this!"
&gt; but libertarians usually insist that property rights are intrinsic.  If we agree that people cannot be slaves, that this is a given, then property rights follow immediately and directly.
Thanks for the link! I'm okay paying a slightly higher price for good gear. 
highest res i could find: http://www.imgbase.info/images/safe-wallpapers/tv_movies/star_wars/7976_star_wars.jpg
&gt; PS: I'll take my check in downvotes, please.  Okay.  (Seriously, if you don't care, why would you even bother saying this?)
I have lurked for awhile myself. [profile](http://i.imgur.com/XBI4H.png)  When I went to reply to this I scanned right past the comment box because I never use it. My girlfriend (not a lurker) yelled, IT'S RIGHT THERE WHY ARE YOU SO SLOW!?!
dam i figured this out one night but i forget the bulk of it. But stop harping on about meaning your missing the point.
&gt; The script the publisher chose to print the cover of the book, made my mother believe the author's name was Gnid Blyton  It's actually Enid Blyton's signature. It's on the cover of most of her books.
Dude, a meat patty is something. You said "nothing". 
system fonts are just files that you can change with admin priviledges.
Lols
*Looks at username*  Not... sure.. if.. trolling
are you ever going to PM me your name so i can send you mario kart?  ...oh it's crossed out, guess i can keep it then &gt;.&lt;
Whatever makes you fuckin' laugh! Imagination's a hell of a thing.
Sounds like she only took you out so she could put you down.  You don't need "friends" like this.
Then no, you're not.
Just finished up a class centered around The Wire and watched the series finale on Thursday. What a great show. The bit with Bubbles in the final montage was one of the biggest victories on TV, despite it being such a seemingly small moment. And his speech in the penultimate episode got me choked up. Andre Royo is fantastic.
Pretty sure it has been posted. Good stuff anyways:)
Awesome. Sounds good.
[Portal Kombat 2](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BKICNxlnrU0)
Source?
Caligula's costume, and a box of condoms.
Burn. **EVERYTHING**  You have been sterilized...
&gt;  your isp has an Ubuntu mirror they provide for "free" updates  What ISP do you use? That's pretty cool.
Oh Byzantium, you so crazy.
5?   Does one pack show and its mate not?
Sounds like Libby Davies riding. She could stay home and not even campaign and still win in a landslide
Hopefully, all goes well.  I lived next to the River most of my life.  Floods are a way of life there, but not much can prepare you for the likes of '93 or '08 flood levels.  Here's hoping the levees do their job.
I didn't get the feeling that Miranda was socially retarded, she just wanted to find an equally-flawless DNA sample to get her pregnant, and was being her usual efficient self in finding prospective partners. Got kind of sad reading all those logs and then finding out she failed a fertility test.
If you MUST wear a pin, wear one that says "Hello". It tells about your language, and it is definitely not rude.
I got a rock...
To be honest, it was too informal for my taste. The Church itself didn't reflect the informality in the RCIA program, but we only met for one hour on Tuesday nights. There was way too much to cover in that time and I feel like we breezed through some of the important things I wish we could have covered. We didn't even cover the Rosary.  I think they make it so informal in order to try to make everyone feel welcome. This works for some people, I think (my husband enjoyed it), but it made me feel awkward and out of place, sort of like they are trying too hard. My experience in the church has been more enjoyable since leaving the RCIA program, however, and I imagine it varies from parish to parish.  I encourage you to come prepared with your own questions because they do try to cover an entire lifetime of doctrine in one hour sessions per week from roughly September to Easter. There's a lot of material, so it's often difficult to get through it all. Use the community (your priests, deacons, or RCIA instructors or sponsor) as often as possible and make sure you ask, ask, ask!  Other than the informality and the amount of time spent in group, the only other real complaint I had with the program was that the priest had no interaction with the group at all. 
fap fap fap fap fap fap...
Kids can also learn about natural selection.
Driver sucked, GTA not only came out earlier, but was way better. Also, wtf is up with the German?
We haven't had a proper LAN since the release of Guild Wars: Factions (2006 I wanna say?) but I am now making it my goal to get one together this summer.
They already did it,  you would need a gatling gun. http://mythbustersresults.com/episode95
everytiiiime...
kayal vizhi welcome to the reddit coffeehouse forum.   கயல் விழி: ரெடிட் காப்பி இல்லத்திற்கு வருக வருக.
I always thought it looked like a bunny with a scarf.   Also there's apparently a city called Hammerfest. 
He answered this a couple questions up
You're applying finite thinking to a infinite universe, the rules change in a conceptually infinite universe.  In an infinite Universe, there wouldn't only be infinite light reaching us, but the sky in general would contain infinite energy in say electromagnetic radiation (including light) for example.  While some papers and people may maintain that an infinite Universe remains a possibility, technically it does I guess, it doesn't have much (any?) evidence for it.  The Big Bang theory proposes a finite universe. 
Sam Carter from Stargate: SG1.  She's played by an attractive actress, sure, but that isn't played up all that often.  She wears the same gear as the guys, fires a gun just as well as the guys, doesn't take crap from the guys...and she's crazy smart to boot!
Oh balls. Sorry. 
In this case, would the plural be sheeps?
"The story surfaced at the critical closing spurt of the federal election campaign, where polls show the surging New Democrats have rocketed into second place behind the Conservatives." No phallic reporting here, move along.
Hrm, weird that definitely shouldn't be slower.  I'll investigate!  (We love reports of programs where we're slower, it helps focus development, we already have tons of programs where we're faster).
Chem 312 Principles of Instrument Analysis
You mean if Obama were slaughtering unarmed protesters en masse and his daughters were chilling out in his house as though he weren't a war criminal? What a dumb thing to say.
Forced labour? WTF why don't they just call it what it is slavery.
It's not as bad as one of mine which said "angry lobotomized marmosets will circumcise you with rusty pliers."
Reddit: 70% male, 30% female Minecraft: 90% male, 10% female LiveJournal: 5% male, 95% female The rest of the internet: ~~50/50~~ 60/40
Is it a tablet or a capsule? I don't believe they make xr's in less than 15mg
Tool - Vicarious   In Flames - Jotun   The Haunted - Abysmal   Muse - City of Delusion   Jimi Hendrix - Voodoo Chile 
People are confusing churches with mega churches I think. I don't care about churches. But the televangelists who run mega churches ought to be dragged out to the middle of the street and shot.
I've been lifting for 1 1/2 years and my DL is at 345lbs and am 17. 
I can't stand this guy. He seems like such a smug dick.
For Steam or console?
Anybody with evidenced hereditary ties to former slaves? Family historians would become pretty popular for a while.  But I'm guessing, I don't know either.
My hope is that one day, I'll click on a NSFW Sexy ____ pic and it will be a sexy guy. It's ruff, being a straight female redditor...
There's this spot on my left index finger that I chew on so much that it's callused. 
The central part of North Carolina. What about you? Classes dedicated to religion are a foreign concept to me. Did you go to private school?
Oh that makes me so happy! I was pretty sure they would just buy it, but thank god. Christiania is such an important part of Copenhagen it would  be a devastating loss.  I can't wait to be back in June, booked my flights today and going to buy my Roskilde ticket asap.   Christiania du har mit hjerte forevigt! 
Squats I thought
he mad
Anal sex.
Wow, way to rationalize antisemitism because of the Israeli-Palestinian conflict. All Jews are not Israelis, let alone Israelis who condone certain treatment of Palestinians by Israel. That's like saying that if you witnessed the genocide in Rwanda, it's understandable for you to hate all black people in every country.
It's Myfest in Kreuzberg at Mariannenplatz today (Sunday). Don't miss it!
&gt;Why almost everyone that's begging for help there is male?  Because the females are busy inducing their partners to suicide.
In case anyone was wondering, Caoimhe is pronounced Keevah. Yeah, I know, Irish is a crazy language.
[Sorry, eh.](http://i.imgur.com/hZw7i.jpg)
just a boring sir, fortunately and/or unfortunately
Someone commented on that site that it was $80,000 U.S.
My uncle just kept grilling them, and I just kept eating them. I have no idea why, it was just one of those transcendent moments of gluttony. I had one when I was twelve, too, so I expect another when I'm thirty-six. 
The report?  ~~I heard NATO broke the story so it appears to be.~~  edit for truth
Word. I completely understand teaching basic principles to beginners.
I've already demo'd the best racquets from basically every manufacturer (through that very program, great service btw), I'm having a really hard time deciding which one to get though.  I was hoping some discussion on here might help sway me one way or another.  What is it about Head racquets do you like compared to others?
By South Asia I mean Bangladesh and maybe Pakistan if the political situation improves.  While you're probably right for Eastern Europe (I was reaching there), many of the governments are still looking for foreign investment. What about much of sub-Saharan Africa?  As labor costs go up in other countries, if the political situations improve, I don't see what would keep investors away.
Did 'confused' consent to your fucking? Otherwise that is a rape.
Things like this make me like the game less. I'm glad it's just a mod.
தூய தமிழில் பேசுவோம் post (n) - பதிவு post (v) - பதிவு செய்
I often found that there was a correlation between those two demographics.
[Solution.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kilt)
Excellent explanation, thanks.
Nice Argentine accent lol! You'd advice studying abroad? I can't decide what to study/dedicate my life to and I'm not very convinced about studying in a private college here :/ (public university education here is best) I want to be sure before I decide I really wanna do that. Any warnings?
It's all that inbreeding. 
Being a guy using the site myself, I can tell you that it's probably nothing. I hop on every now and then and search around for people, sometimes visiting profiles without at first realizing that I've already seen them, and just move on from there. That is likely all this is, if he really was a creeper he would be incessantly messaging you.
lol I just now saw this at 8pm and I live in Camp Hill.
&gt;Picture of dude crying over dead cat != most heart breaking photo  what is? whatever example you give, i'll find a reason to call you heartless and out of touch based on your answer.  hell, i bet you've felt worse about getting dumped by some some girl than you did about the people that died in this incident. and that's probably the norm for most.  people have broad and complex reasons for helping or feeling moved in any given situation, and it's most certainly not based on some absolute factor like "how many people died". it's just the way it is, you can call them "REALLY sick" people because of it, but you'd be a hypocrite.
Coupling
violentacrez made that post, creepy uncle...  He asked if I wanted it post to that sub too, but I didn't want to say yes because 1. Too cocky. 2. ... *It feels weird, damnit!*
Balls.
I've been looking too much into those sweet gifs as of late. I sat there for a good minute waiting for him to move.
1.) Apache attack helicopter 2.) Pilot
So basically Google is more useful and reliable, where as Bing is better to use when you are really bored. Right? 
Toto - Africa works on so many levels, long drives, short drives, working out, etc.
Just so you know . . . I did NOT approve of that hat, though the support is appreciated.
Sounds characteristic of a puzzle game.
This is the best thing I've read all week.   Kudos.
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SZf64NfQATM) is what's going on in my head when I look at this. 
I used a Phillips body groomer and sometimes a little grape-seed oil on the shaving head to make things go easier. The oil makes the head move more smoothly, and conditions the remaining hair to make it soft.
Ok, I did get you [one more basic link to get you started](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Urban_sprawl).
I'm not 100% on it either but I'm pretty sure if I google five different pieces of jargon and only get one or two results that are false positives, then it's all just BS.
Accents are séxy
Black - bueno  Colored, Negro, Nigger, African-American, Spade, Darkie, Tar baby, Porchmonkey, Coon, Eggplant, Crow, Jig, Jiggaboo, Sambo, Macaca, Moolie - no bueno
Lebron. He is the best all-around player and doesn't really have any holes in his game. Then, I'd go for a defensive big man and a guard that can shoot well.
He's funny, but kind of a princess to work for. Granted, that was years ago.
Indeed, like a sober debate between philosophers, explaining their opposing points of view with articulate deliveries and well-thought counterpoints.  The sheer class.
Are you fat, by any chance?
thumbnail kinda makes it look like the fallen from transformers 2
......where is my gas can and match?
My greatest political hope is that the 2016 elections are Boehner vs. Weiner.
I'm also getting a separate sound card because a friend told me it frees up the motherboard. Is it actually worth it do to that and if so is it noticeable at all?
They sure don't make action figures now like they used to. This is really sweet.
Wow, why the downvotes? I thought this was good for a quick laugh.
Impossible, the smell that comes off those places is ridiculous.  And I used to work at a real fish/shrimp fast food place.  The smell coming off of LJS was definitely not from cooking real fish.
Can't stand ya!
im starting to get turned on using bing... see what i did there. yeah. take note of that.
And Valve said it couldn't be done! Hah!
?  How am I a statist?  It is a FACT that the state accredits schools.  You can't get a real diploma from a non-accredited school.  You can't get into a college with a diploma from a non-accredited school.  Those are FACTS and don't make me anything.  I didn't say that I supported that, hell in Texas the state would probably accredit a school that only taught creationism.  In my opinion schools should have to be accredited by a college board and getting a HS diploma means you are actually ready to go to college.  If you can't cut HS you become an apprentice in a trade, or get a McJob. Education is a good thing and when I hear people like Dr. William Bennett, the former Secretary of Education, talk about "them intellectual elites" it just makes me want to fucking puke.  Bob Bennett the anti-intellectual intellectual.  How the hell did he get to be the Secretary of Education?
my default text messaging app has a black background, went into the settings and chose "dark mode"
[Only one of the funniest lines ever uttered on television.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hGo5bxWy21g&amp;feature=player_detailpage#t=72s)
Very true. I just don't want to go to a couple of shops, try a few shoes on, go to another shop try some shoes on and realize that then have to make a repeat trip back to get the shoes I want.  I wanted to get an understanding of how each brand builds there shoe so I can find a shop that has the brand that may work best for me and then try those shoes on plus the other shoes that have in stock. 
Oh wow....I just had a flashback to this chart when you said Nagant:  http://mouseguns.com/compare.htm
&gt;I agree. If I attempt to kill you, but I don't actually do it, how is that a crime?  The reason attempted murder is a crime is because murder is a crime. The logic does not follow with regard to counterfeiting.  &gt;Well then obviously you should print up some fake money and never use it. I'm sure that will solve the problem.  How on earth does this solve any of these problems:  &gt;Say I don't like my bank's reserve ratio: I think it is too high. Or I think that their security is ineffectual, or I want a bank with a different MB. What are my options?  Oh right, it doesn't.
Second!  I loved the game for more reasons than I could possibly list here. but one of them came from a great writer. link below.  http://www.icybrian.com/freezer/tavisramzapower.php  and excellent article on why Ramza is Ramza and why we love em'
Yep.
I agree that a revolution may be necessary, I disagree that it needs to be a violent one like the French revolution.  The majority of violence in the American revolution was reactionary based on the British sending in troops to keep the U.S. form leaving, the French was bloody and vicious from the start. We should never hope to emulate the French revolution, many innocent people (on both sides of the revolution) lost their lives.  I'm just saying that if we do end up having another revolution, let's keep it civil. We arm ourselves, march to the government buildings and escort those we are aiming to dispose to their house/jail where they are forced to stay until the new government is in place. We don't need to be senselessly chopping off heads. If we do that, especially if we do it like the French and have no proper trial, then we are no better than those we see stripping us of our rights.
or those grow your penis ads
That's because the galaxies are very simplistic, single point mass objects, and not a distributed mass object like it would be in reality. This is something I want to improve, but there's many higher priorities.
I was hitting a bong the moment i heard that Michael Jackson had died. Idk if that constitutes as a disaster but its all i got....
Unfortunately, the global corporate capitalist model we not only accept here in the west but actively work to propagate everywhere renders it economically unfeasible to do it properly.
Wow!  You did better than just _mentioning_ the big pointy teeth!
Yeah man look at Idra, his spending is spot on. But I agree with OP and that's why you never see Catz and Vibe winning anything. They just are a tier down from the top zergs in the world. 
[r/anarcho_capitalism](http://www.reddit.com/r/Anarcho_Capitalism/comments/h13qh/the_sad_state_of_things_at_ranarchism/) would like to have a word with you.
What about my documents and such? I have a fair bit of work done on a software project that I don't much feel like losing.
I am strongly against the notion of ideas and human intellectual achievement being privatized. The foundation of my belief lies in the history of societal development. Humanity evolved by sharing ideas with each other, from songs to cultivation of food. Individual child development hinges on constant mental stimulation. I don't see how it can be ethical to deny any child access to any knowledge it requires to expand its capabilities based on the idea that some people were simply born into the wrong family. Capitalist ownership of intellectual property is in diametric opposition to the general good of societal development, in many ways. As I've demonstrated previously, dismantling of copyright, patent, and trademark doesn't have to mean dismantling of the economy as a whole. There are many business models which can still function effectively even without denying countless people access to knowledge because they can't afford it.
Agreed. Personal responsibility is important in any discussion, but vital in these. As a man it's my responsibility to admit that I may be parroting male bias unwittingly, and if proven wrong it's my responsibility to either correct my argument, or point out the fallacy in the other person's argument. It all boils down to being able to question your own ideas as much, and as strongly, as you question others.   I'm glad to see that you've inherited this mindset and are pushing forward with your beliefs.
That wink at the end was spot on
That was my life today..counted 15 fraps in a row today lol
You're confusing "Should I?" with "*Can* I?"  Most people, I think, answer those two in totally different ways without cognitive dissonance.
When my husband left the church, a few years before I finally jumped the fence and followed his footsteps, the best thing he did was love me, he showed me that no matter what I chose, he loved me.  We talked about what I liked about the church, what I wanted in my life that (I thought) only the church could give me (like the closeness of reading scriptures and praying together) and compromised with what I need from him in those respects.  The most comforting thing at the time was that I knew that he 'did it the right way'.  Meaning I knew at the time, without a doubt, that he prayed, went through church resources (as well as non), and tried his hardest to 'just have faith'.  When this was happening, for me, he had broken my heart in the worse way imaginable to me at the time.  He took what I longed for my whole life; a fairytale temple marriage and made me question what I was taught my whole life as the only truth.  I took good advice and waited it out, and eventfully I realized/decided my love for him was more important to me than having a Mormon man.  This was four years ago and I am still recovering from Mormonism.  Me and my husband are still married and have an even stronger bond now than we ever have before.  Give your wife time, be patient, and just love her.
as being 15 pretty much implies, i have no idea what i believe. All i know is that i identify with the culture of judiasm, not quite the religious aspect.
They all look a bit brown tinged to me. Compare to the girl sitting on the guys lap who is clearly white. 
Sounds to me like they have been programmed by the tories. 
Sorry, I just re-read your comment, and realized I was pretty stupid.   I still maintain that Bing wasn't stealing Google's results, but the anti-Bing sentiment on Reddit is far too great, and will probably lead to me being downvoted, and thus, there is little point in posting it. 
You actually make a good point. People are much quicker to downvote comments they don't like as opposed to submissions they don't like. Or at least I am. 
I could write for a while about your question, but one point: Economics has made a lot of progress in many areas, and that's often forgotten. Unfortunately, the place where it has made the least progress happens to be business cycle theory... i.e. the part everybody cares about right now.
Yeah I think Gambino is way overrated, everyone on reddit fawns over him. The difference between him and kanye is being interesting.
I believed I learned about image files and mounting because of this game. I couldn't even get it to launch properly for a day or so being I was such a n00b.  I played through the Nosferatu class until the story concluded, but I remember really enjoying it and wanting to go back and alter my choices in conversations. That's awesome that there is a little more depth to game added through patches. I've always wanted to play through it again/play through all the classes.
Thank you! I love my hair, it's so manly.
A robe and wizard hat.
So I am right. Not even 1 degree C and in less then 150 years?   Yes, I realize the answer of,  "A few degrees of global warming has a huge impact on ice sheets, sea levels and other aspects of climate."  That wasn't the question. The question is that we are basing this on less than 1 degree of Celsius in less than 150 years?
Bubble baths. Well...I don't really care about the bubbles...but they are rather *delightful* while submerging myself in steaming water :)
Major genesis of organs occur from 2-8 weeks.  This is also the period that embryos are most sensitive to teratogens or substances that may cause birth defects.  By 8 weeks it also comes to resemble a human vs a more generic embryonic structure similar to a chicken's embryo.
That's a behavioural economics game. It suffers fairly heavily from scaling to zero. Its design allows it to test rationality of subject groups. Because very few will pick a number high than 66, as a result people wont go above 42 etc etc and you end up with numbers really low depending on economic rationality.  Did three attempts of this a few years ago: Arts, Sci/Engo and Economics students, n=20. I can't remember exactly what the numbers were but Arts was the highest at around 40, Sci/engo and eco were fairly close around the 15-20 mark.  By no right answer, I'm guessing you mean there is no equilibrium outcome. But I don't see how this game proves there is no rational markets.
Thus ensuring overrepresentation of the rich and educated, who of course will self-sacrificially support egalitarian, humanistic policies that support everyone (poor and rich) equally.  Right?
This happens to one of my friend she has a hella low tolerance so she always passes out or is incapable of doing anything 
Sounds like you just want free shit, to me.
It varies depending on what they are coming with. If you're buying JUST the scorpion, probably $15-25 for an adult.
he was cuffed. Is slamming a cuffed person's face into a wall ever justified? Unless he had the cops balls in his cuffed hands.... and yes... that has been used as an excuse for one LA cop who slammed a kids face into a hood after they had him completely under control.
It's amazing what a load of bullshit people will tell themselves to justify an untenable position.
You know all those rage comics about women? Yeah, they're about YOU.
As far as obscure Simpson's references go, you win.  I drink to you, sir.
amen... think you're right about the timing of the PK being the bigger source of frustration  Howwwwwwarrrrrrdddd!
the ("R" - MT) says it all...what a dick. 
hmm… do they have an online version?
See the ad partially visible at the top of the screen. I notice is momentarily when I unlock from LockInfo, and caught it here in this MMS. This is a relatively new phenomenon, but I can't figure out where it's coming from.  On a separate note, I think we need a "caption this" contest for Elmo. It looks like he's up to something.
Not quite. The calves are about the only thing I noticed when you pointed it out. Apart from that you obviously can't compare and contrast her upper arm between the two pictures seeing as how it's more hidden in the first. I'm not a mean guy.
Do I need any? I could look, but you can find patristic support for just about any doctrine under the sun.  The "gates of hades" is used a couple times in the Septuagint in the same way (Job 38:17).  In the Hebrew it's translated as the "gates of Sheol" and has the same meaning (Isaiah 38:10 for example).
Who is going to beat 1/10th of them to death each time?  Really, though, you're going against the spirit of the question.  As OP said,  &gt; Their only intent is to kill you.
Well, I say.
I cross my legs weirdly when sitting on the floor. Most people cross their legs like [this](http://www.worldofstock.com/slides/PMO5710.jpg), only I put my right leg/foot on top of my left knee. Every time I do this, someone has to point it out, and then everyone sitting on the floor proceeds to attempt to sit like I am, and most people can't do it for some reason.
But, it would be interesting to see how this pans out if we do run out of cheap labor.  I tend to think along the lines of the crises of capitalism.
Well considering China is investing heavily in Africa currently, could be entirely accurate. 
Is that even a question?
means "lone wolf" in Japanese
I quit IT and decided to go back to college to get a bachelors in nursing. I'm very excited about my future.
Should be better then, because... nevermind. You know why.
Let me know if this pans out
I really hope this isn't fake. 
[](/megusta)
I really really REALLY must get this game ASAP.
Well i guess there really is more than one way to crack an egg
This wasn't the first gun I've ever shot by far so I've had my chance to warm up to .45 cal. I can easily hit a target at 25 yards consistently with it so no worries there. But yes, the ammo is pricey.
Perhaps, and I'm completely guessing here, Jason Momoa is in constant beast mode which enamours him with a certain presence. Making him appear a few inches taller.
He was never put on trial.
Well played, good sir.
I took the third one. Thank you very much :D
Damn, he's huge. According to wikipedia, the guy's supposed to be 242 lbs.
What IS ironic: this pic was taken on her cigarette break.
Good question. It looks like you're asking for possible dream scenarios, so here's mine:   Cons: 120  Lib: 90-100  NPD: 40-50  Bloc: 47  Green: 1 I like your idea of a fairly unified group of two parties that still don't have a majority on their own, but my reasons for the Liberals over the NDP are:  1) Space policy - I want Marc Garneau to manage Canada's science policy. Canada's first astronaut and former head of the CSA. Even flew the Challenger.  2) Ignatieff - Among other things, I like how he doesn't have a stump speech and just takes questions from whoever wants to ask them.   I'm also an expat (11 years) and if Ignatieff does bad the Conservatives' "just visiting" schtick will certainly have had something to do with it. As a result, other Canadians with a great deal of overseas experience that would like to get into government may choose to shy away from it because no matter how hard you try (Ignatieff's been at it for six years so far) the question of whether you're loyal to Canada keeps on coming up. Canada needs to be a country where overseas experience is valued, not villified.  3) Calgary Centre North - the Liberal candidate is by far the superior candidate here.  I don't like May's leadership of the Green Party but if they fail to lose a seat they may just fade away entirely. Then again the NDP has just as good an environmental record so perhaps it's not that important. I certainly won't be that upset if she fails to win a seat.  Finally, on the NDP: I'm glad to see their support rising and I hope they pick up seats (which they will). On the other hand they do have a lot of dud candidates, people put in ridings that they never expected to win, and I don't want to see them in parliament. It's better for the party too, as they could end up embarrassing the NDP once they are put in the spotlight. Better to win about an extra ten seats with some really good candidates and go from there.
Hot!
You have my upvote. As a male, I don't want to have to sneak away from my girlfriend to play videogames. I don't want to have to hide my passion for it as a hobby. I grew up playing them. It's a culture I am a part of. Accept it as a part of who i am or gtfo.  My suggestion to you, talk to him about it. If you're willing to learn to play, see if he's willing to teach you. It could even be fun, and create a shared hobby that will bring you closer together. If his lack of physical activity bothers you, find a way to gamify it.
good for bing
Reports are coming in that the cook was preparing Cornish game hens for dinner.  The strike was preventing the genocide of little tiny chickens.
oh damn, need more!
It's like going from virginity to a coke fueled gang bang in one night. I hope you don't catch karmitis.
problem solved!
I do not understand what you're trying to convey here.  Perhaps you can elaborate.
Yes, except the pop filter which did a poor job. Notice the popping 'p' sounds?
I thought the true reason behind the fall of Rome was that, lacking a zero, they had no way to indicate successful termination of their C programs?  (Robert Firth)
Libertarian here... well... not really. Anti-statist, or what most people would call "anarcho-capitalist." But I don't like to call myself that.  "Rights" are nothing more than privileges and what constitutes as property or ownership is completely subjective and dependent on the society.  (Also the social contract is bullshit.) 
I wasn't going to log in today but i am honestly grateful i did. Your Work Down Time album + your audio was so erotic and with you perfectly toned legs i just couldn't contain myself.   
sagging my pants nigguh!
Always thought a lion would be awesome.   But most of the legendaries do have a loose basis in mythology. the weather trio is based on the triad of mythic beasts from early hebrew myth, Leviathan, Behmoth, and Ziz.  Not to mention dragons out the wazoo in the past two gens
Hm... not sure what the issue with the 9500 is, but I'm guessing it's your CPU, not the GPU. Your laptop most likely have a C2D or better correct? 
Take that shit to /r/rateme.
So, you figured me all out, did ya? 
False.  Mao was more of an orthodox communist than the Soviets or Khrushchev ever were.  The Sino-Soviet split was due to the fact that the Soviets were warming up the idea of Communism coexisting with capitalism in the world.  They were fanatical.
Way to burn minerals...
I remember when I was really into nostalgia...
Must know where this is from!!!!
chew my left knuckle
At first, I was really hoping they had come up with a technology to interface with your still-comatose brain ... then I realized that was kind of a cruel thing to hope for. Congratulations on coming back out of it!  My questions: Did you dream? How much do you remember, if anything? How did you feel physically when you woke up? Mentally? How quickly were you aware of how much time had passed? Was it more like waking up from a long sleep or were there more shocks to your system? Did anyone amaze you by coming to visit (or not coming to visit)?
Considering we had portal-able surfaces in the 1950s-era Aperture Labs, long before anyone had gone to the moon to make the conversion gel, no, it doesn't require a conversion gel paint to make portals on it.
Let's do some back-of-the-envelope math, shall we? The 100 Roman soldiers are standing in a circle around you 500 m away. That means they're spread out over a circumference of 2 * pi * 500m long. That's roughly 3140 meters. That means there's a Roman soldier every 31 meters. You don't have to plow through anything.
Strangely.... I feel better :)
I accept that you think I'm wrong.
This is, amongst other reasons why I own a MacBook Pro.
Delete your account.
What about pubic hair, hmm? I trim, down below, but nothing else. It itches like a bitch and I look like I'm fucking 12.
It really is. See the post from RedAnarchist :   &gt; Tip 20%, if you can afford to go out to eat, you can afford to tip.
I came here to make sure you complained.  Good for you.  Let's hope they never do this crap again.
I read it as "Kooler with AK", and I was going to agree
a gun
I mean some states say anything 50cc or higher requires vehicle registration and a motorcycle license to operate.  So by making a 49cc scooter, manufacturers skirt the law. I'm pretty sure it's not all states, so you'll need to check the laws in yours.
I did used to think about this stuff when I was younger like you do and before anyone informed me what consquentialism was  It harps back to the would you kill you mother to save 10 children, 100..... billion?  See in things like star trek it all gets very rhetorical but if you don't accept kantian ethics (which is quite intuitive btw) you end up with some funky extremes that pretty much never happen which is wy both kantian and utilitrianism often BOTH work so very well in the real world.  honour vs weighing the odds  Anyways i'm off to re-route a runaway trolley
You called?
-Chuck Norris
http://knowyourmeme.com/memes/waffles-dont-you-mean-carrots  I don't have the mental strength to explain since I just woke up, so this link will have to make do :P
The state of the game has changed a little bit since last year, but he has done a very good comparison of the two games.  In fact, I am surprised at how fair and descriptive he is of each game.
Considering what the distributors make and the risk actors take, they are poorly paid. Also, it's not a profession that allows for aging and coming from porn, your employment opportunities are limited.   
at my school there was this kid asking people outside the library if he could bum an adderall.  i cry for our future (see [](/2229))
Rape a bunch of people.
Which is very funny because the NP and doctor are 2 hours away and don't know about each other.   But yea, I will ignore two medical professionals and listen to you. 
Terrible comparisons. Written to convince rather than inform therefore not a good scientific document.   I have to say that the climate system has to have a non-linearity that pushes any positive feedback mechanism back to steady state, otherwise the system would have run away from an animal releasing some tiny amount of methane in the past... IE page 10 isn't a very good picture at all...  Clearly there is anthropogenic forcing of the system what is unclear is the dynamics of the complex system and if it matters.  positive effect of CO2 "overwhelmed by the negative effects of heat stress and drought", maybe but the idea that mean temperature rise = drought is based on complex models. Higher temperatures actually mean more rain not less, it is a question of where it rains, these models that predict drought suggest that the rain will mostly fall back in the oceans.  There are lots of problems with climate science, mostly because of social and political interest and intervention. 
Still no poly pack for Engineer?
eh, i was aware of its glorification of the boll weevil, but that night it was referred to as "that weird ass bug monument" coupled with "what a bunch of cotton farming hicks."   but of course i'm a hypocrite because i grew up in a cotton farming area and could build you a boll weevil trap from memory and a few supplies.
For sale   Baby scorpions   Never worn
I live in Arkansas and the weather guy on the news here basically told us to prepare for hell.  It was bad but NOTHING like what it became once it got through here.  Holy crap.  It should also be mentioned that I have a horrible fear of bad weather and took a handful of Xanax just to keep from having a heart attack. 
Mind full of fuck
More air?  It's already full of hot air how much more do you require?
Yes that's what was said publicly but I bet that the conference called them and gave them some serious shit about it
It was rage from my perspective [](/beh)
I think much more could be done with the title "The Fapping Menace" - I was disappointed by the link here.
See if you can guess what I am now.  ...  I'm a mouthful of mashed potatoes.  Get it?
...but also of how rational the other participants *think* the other participants are, and so on.
Ah right.
Thus he is a troll and not a troll at the same time.
upvoted anyway ;-)
Chlorine Gas and a Gas Mask
Why do they say "1500 kWh per year"? That's 1500000 watt hours per 8760 hours. That's 1500000 / 8760 watts. So this thing produces an average of 171 watts.  Higher when it's more windy, lower when it's less of course, averaging out to 171 watts over the course of a year.
I really don't understand why you're being downvoted so much. Sense is not appreciated here. 
Basically exactly when you quit is when the show got consistently good.  Strange i know but the last 5-6 episodes have really gone down well and i look forward to next weeks every time i finish an episode.
Do you have a source for this?
You should set them free, they are fantastic so far :)
Marla Singer hands down
i was in school with him, camp as fuck
Background: This http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/h0wff/the_mexican_cook_at_my_job_came_in_with_this/ is what started the conversation. Yes, they know my name and yes we get along. Someone just said, "That's how I refer to you." I'm not really mad, I guess I thought we (coworkers) saw past this.
:D Fond Du Lacker :D
As much as I enjoy Daft Punk... they aren't fit to lick these guy's space boots.
Of course it's of taste, thats why it's *how I feel*. Nas &amp; Damian are pretty cool but the others to me are just meh.
Close, but not quite.  The principle of contemporaneity requires a nexus between actus reus and mens rea WHEN THE CRIME WAS COMMITTED.  The question is not whether he has a guilty mind by trial time, but whether he had a guilty mind when he committed the act.  Barring an abnormality of mind at the time of the crime, the offender will have the requisite mens rea.  A memory wipe after the crime will not change the fact that the offender had a guilty mind when he committed the crime.   
you have found Shangri-La on the internet
I hope she doesn't get arrested.
Swords can still kill a person you know... just that you'd wouldn't want to use them during a war these days...
Mourinho wouldn't have been given the goal /trollface
I was under the assumption that Gadaffi was in an adjacent house.
~~I've always wondered: how do you get a view like this?~~  Nevermind.  Wow, the one thread I decide to finally ask this question in already has the answer.  Thanks!
Argument from authority, nice. Although I don't really consider someone who is a reporter for a crappy little blog to be an authority. I read your earlier link, and I disagree with a lot of it, which is what i am allowed to do since i can think critically.  Everything in that link is just stories about how many people died from cars in the early history of automobiles, which is something I would expect from a people that don't have much driving experience, and from a society that had not learned how to live with cars all over the roads. It's kind of a situation similar to modern transportation in China or India, where driving is not embedded in their culture, so they drive in a way that many Americans find insane. The author of that link then twists those into an idea that because there were a lot of deaths, a majority of people were against cars. I don't agree with that conclusion at all, and I haven't agreed with anything you have said so far either. Sorry if that hurts you since you clearly think you are an expert in this area, and anyone who disagrees is a moron. 
depending on how much science he knows try to describe how we are all part of the stars and parts of us will always exist as they have existed before us etc going back to the beginning of the universe and continuing until the end. and the memories he has of his grandfathers will continue to exist in his mind and when he grows up and tells his kids about their great grandpa he will never be forgotten.
*fap fap fap fap* ... what? ... *fap fap fap fap*
Yeah, they play it closer to the source of the parody than the Onion.
Trump certainly is going to give her a run for her money.
Oh thank the Gods I'm not the only one who read the article.
Need to add some more eye-candy, but [here's mine](http://i.imgur.com/Rey70.jpg).
This doesn't address my argument for why this policy is bad (specifically, for the taxpayer).
Putin is mad! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Iw5Ij_RFJ1Q
Obvious "The Social Network" reference.
Has our distopic culture blinded you, or perhaps caused you to become a purist? Or does it have nothing to do with our modern culture or lack of one?
I'm almost to the point where I'm comfortable without a shirt now. It's definitely a strange feeling.
Love the show. So happy when netflicks instant got the episodes :) 
From the view of the artist, your intentions are everything.  Whats his incentive to make music if he's not to be compensated for it?
[Seriously?](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/h0k8o/what_is_she_doing/)
May truly be beautiful, but my sleep deprived mind was not able to cope with it.  I'm just going to bed after 149 more RSS updates, just got done with a Con over here, so my sleep pattern was, well, nonexistent.
Radiation
welcome, make sure to put your friend code in the friend code spreadsheet to the right in this sub reddit.
Let's get this over with
Beautiful body + sexy viking red hair.   Post some more pictures of your pussy though, I couldn't really see how it looked from the pics you posted already, and would like to see more. I can't really remember you.. but you NEED to post more often. We're lacking more of you, here. MOAR MOAR MOAR *chants* MOAR MOAR MOAR 
Keep the doritos, you'll need to be fit to usurp the bastards keeping people "in their place".
wow, i've never been to that site before. VERY imformative, thanks for linking!!
Cause she said so, duh.  
I'm not sure if it has been stated specifically (though I did read a lot of comments)...  Unless this man is owning unusable land, as in unable to be farmed, he is most likely making an income off the product harvested and or rent for the property.  If he's sitting on land, for whatever reason, waiting for a developer, he inherited it, I don't really care, then I don't know what to say.  He's silly?  So it's possible to assume he is at least making $25,000 off the land he owns, that amount could even be exponentially higher depending on the quantity of land owned.  What I'm getting to is that after $174,000, he is still making money.  Just like Duffy and anybody else who says they are "cash strapped", realize the life you're living.  Mo Money Mo Problems, right?  That still doesn't resolve the issue at hand.  He is out of touch.  He made choices that he has to live up to.  On the flip side, there are people out there who have made choices they have to live up to, but don't have the means to even do so.  IE, having more children than you, personally, can provide for.  This isn't always the case, it does happen though.  I would not compare having another child to owning a second home.
"Develop the West" : P
I don't think you understand how income taxes work, [47% of legal residents and citizens already pay nothing in income taxes](http://finance.yahoo.com/news/Nearly-half-of-US-households-apf-1105567323.html?x=0), in many cases they even receive 'refunds' from the government, getting back more than they paid.  With their income levels the vast majority of illegals would just join the ranks of Americans that contribute nothing yet be eligible for even greater benefits, increasing the burden on the middle and upper classes.
I don't understand.
TV: I have cable in my home, I'm already paying for the product, I have a DVR so I'd be skipping the commercials anyways, I just like to be able to take my shows with me.  Movies: I live in Canada and until Netflix gets a better library I don't feel like paying them. I do intend to switch eventually though.  Music: I actually do buy music from artists I like. If I discover a new artist though I usually won't shell out a good $100 for their entire catalog, I'll just pirate that, but new albums I will usually buy on iTunes.
I'm more interested in the investigation for price fixing on gas prices. When all gas prices within 5 miles are only 1 cent different no matter what brand something shifty is going on.  A barrel of oil cost the same today as it did in 1980. i could understand some price increase for tech advancement and so forth. But to go from 1.25 to 3.96 for a gallon of gas?
http://i.imgur.com/SCvpO.jpg
Love the show. So happy when netflicks instant got the episodes :) 
I guess we can forgive you for missing [this one](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/bxwec/this_man_is_a_badass/), it's from before your time.
Oh, and I'm not an "Elder of the body of Christ."  Just someone who *tries* to look at the text first rather than the theology.
Mine never chewed on them, but love pressing the hell out of the buttons.  And throwing them.  Definitely throwing them.
Nope, that's an [urban myth](http://www.guardian.co.uk/science/2008/dec/17/medicalresearch-humanbehaviour).
yeah you should see/try it too!
Check back in a few days. The views will have caught up.
&gt;president of the OCSTA Nancy Kirby stresses to Xtra that GSAs are still banned in all Catholic schools because the clubs lead to activism  Oh no...not activism.  Can you imagine a group of people running around helping the oppressed and downtrodden, trying to show compassion to the social outcasts?   How un-Christ-like is that? &gt;Jacquie Guerron, a parent of six children, says talking about sex at any age is “wrong.”  Any belief system that replies upon, encourages, or promotes wilful ignorance is one that should have no place in an educational setting.
Ohh wow edgy!  Hey, what's the deal with airline food?
Your comment here is a lot clearer than the youtube video on the front page. Now i get the idea and it does seem interesting as a concept (i'm a sucker for lists). So i guess you should rethink your introduction of the website.
&gt; But saved $2K in cash in about 3 days now. I'm on the savings run.  It's posts like these that make me want to be a prostitute.
...and then the kid gets his final back with a 97. The only people who actually put down that they're going to fail a test are THESE people: The ones who keep saying they will fail and do better than the rest. It's like trolling everyone that sees the comic
Way to go guys, you fucked up his streak.  Douchebags.
I understand where you are coming from and really do appreciate and see where you are going with some of the points you are trying to make but I must interject. &gt; I'm going into journalism myself and very much intend to make any books I might write free for download. The difference here is that you are making a choice to make your product freely and openly available. If a person or even a corporation want to charge for a product that is their prerogative. Development takes time, skill and effort and if someone wants to charge for it they should be allowed to, just like you are allowed to freely release anything you do to the public domain via creative commons.
worth it?
Interestingly, Taiwan has a very high GDP per capita, and an HDI ranking of 25th. It significantly benefited in the 90s and 2000's from NAFTA.  Real annual growth in GDP has averaged about eight percent during the past three decades.  IMF estimated Taiwan's 2010 GDP-PPP at over US$34700, surpassing that of Finland, France and Japan all at once.  For all intents and purposes it's a developed country now.
I am actually not the OP that you responded to first. I was just saying that I can verify that some of us do indeed just download/delete games on the fly.
"Cash poor"?!?! He should try being food poor and clothing poor and gas poor.
Thanks!
Uptokes to that [4]
So, you had no problems after you left the hospital?
You are not.
Huh, I guess that scorpion mother hasn't heard the fable about the frog and the scorpion.
TIL some people still believe everything that the Gadaffi regime says.
Why?
Yes, but rear view cameras are only one of the new and exciting features found in the **2012 FORD FOCUS.**
Burgers don't kill people. People kill people.
You have mood swings of depression and mania. It can be for minutes, days, hours or months. You're judgement is a bit impaired. You have racing thoughts, it feels like a thousand thoughts jumping around in your head but you just can't get them all out. You're unfiltered so you'll say anything..very blunt, brutally honest. And sometimes you'll cry for no reason. 
openly suggest and drink wine at bar/parties where I'm usually forced to drink beer or any other such drinks coz they are "manly" and you are made fun of if you drink wine
Who else thought it was a Mummified Elephant at first?
"You could have at least waited till the release of TDKR"
An argument could be made about progress.
I've known some Southeast Asians whose skin did in fact have a certain yellow tinge to it.  Just as I'm sure you know plenty of white people whose skin is ruddier than others'. Or black people whose skin is darker than others'.  I never understood using "yellow" to refer to Japanese or Chinese people, though. In my experience, Japanese and Chinese skin appears very pale, not yellow, compared to average white skin.  I also don't know why "black people" and "white people" are accepted terms (the former slightly less than the latter), but "yellow people" is not.
Um...wow. *Must not fap*
I did until they made the new one that I couldn't change the style of. I had to go download the one from 2.2 modded up of course. I hate those chat bubbles so much... SO MUCH!!!!!
For the first few days I thought some weird shit man. I thought I was set up or just... I didn't know man. It was horrible really.
Running is my hangover cure.  I keep telling myself I can puke after the next mile.  After 3, I don't feel like puking anymore.  
&gt;5) gee, so I can murder someone and get away with it legally. Self defense isn't murder.
I choked a guy out effectively in a street fight. My friend also successfully used BJJ in a street fight about a month ago. More detailed post was submitted to /r/martialarts several weeks ago.
Honestly i was just expecting a reply with no text.
Exactly. Women are people, and people are capable of teaching about people. Shocking. 
Vive la France! :D
Do a Malkavian playthrough. It's entirely different. Your character is so batshit insane you have no idea what you're saying half the time. Also, you get to argue with a stop sign.
Well, this can only end well.
I wish there was a rip that sounded clean and loud.
@papa, I know people who have way less than that and have their own plane...so yeah, it's enough.  And until you see a listing of his "net worth" you can't really say that it doesn't include aircraft.
DO, NOT, GO, SECURITY FORCES! Not sure what you mean by rates, As I've never heard of that phrase, Everyone in the AF gets paid the same, Anywho, if you like computers, Go for Cyber Systems Operations, It's my field and it's great! You can get stationed anywhere! EDIT: for example, I am currently in Hawaii!
Thanks. It was also a surprise to me (how interesting they were) once I got light pulses working.
If I learned anything from Reddit, its when to drink my own piss.  I apply to it to long Reddit sessions of course, as it takes care of both of your key points.
Not to dis your hobby or anything, but pictures of human anatomy collections are not really that creepy to me. Maybe they are to some people, but I think most science students have seen skeletons, etc, and even with atmospheric lighting, they are not much outside the spectrum of prime-time TV these days. Now, maybe an AmA on why you collect human remains...  I should submit more. I do a lot of work in biotech and pharmaceutical labs, and while most of it is pretty boring, some of that stuff does get pretty creepy... lab rooms full of malaria-infected mosquitoes, monkeys with bolts in their heads, surgically-modified animals of various sorts, etc. I'm usually not allowed to take pictures, and it's not stuff that would be an obvious fit to begin with, but there is a lot of stuff out there that is genuinely creepy. It's just not mostly in this forum. 
Your sister just said that to make herself feel better for letting Mike Smith take her home.
thread = lol@muslim rage and downvotes.   Yea, do it. You know you want it. Hell, that would be quite a honor. Just shows that you'll never have any civility with these clowns.
Yes, i think it's one of dom jolly's stooges, still so hilarious, thank you for the upload op, I haven't seen this in a while, good laugh :)
No offense, but if you believe that you're  &gt;not an economist by any means  why would your belief (I assume) tax cuts don't create jobs be true either?  Economics is an extremely complex issue, like global warming.  Isn't proclaiming one side to be true without any knowledge just like the Republican policy of saying global warming doesn't exist without any backing?  But as for your actual question, tax cuts don't create jobs because we have a fairly legitimate consensus among economists.  Some of the most respected economists like Shiller (I would argue he's the best alive) and Krugman have been calling for tax increases, so I listen to the experts.  I'm aslo by no means an expert economist (I doubt I'll get a PHD in economics), but it's generally held that tax increases reduce our incentive to work.  Basically, you can look at it like overtime.  If people eliminate double overtime, would you be willing to do it?  The opposing argument (that I support) is that the impact of tax increases isn't that large.  Yes, the rich will be less willing to work, but it has a negligible impact on what they do, especially in comparison to the benefits tax increases create.
As others have suggested, Africa is a fucking enormous place.  Is it safe?  There are many safe countries, there are some unsafe ones.  Even within unsafe countries there are safe places to travel, and there are unsafe places in the safe countries.  I spent ~4 months in Accra, Ghana and traveled quite a bit throughout the city and the country.  Did a couple excursions to Togo and Burkina Faso as well.  There were some tense situations, but on the whole I felt very safe while I was there.  I think in general if you keep your head about you, there will be no problems. Caveat: I am only speaking from my experiences in this small subset of countries, I think the advice should generalize to most countries, except maybe the major issue areas (Cote D'Ivoire, DRC, Somalia, Zimbabwe...), but take that with a grain of salt. Wherever you go you'll find that there are good people, in most places the ratio of good people to bad people is fairly high.  When people see you, they usually can tell from a mile away that you are a foreigner (esp. if you are not black), they know you are not in your element.  Most people, knowing this, will look out for you.  So to avoid the human dangers (i.e. people trying to steal from you or take advantage of you in some way), just stay in populated areas. As far as other things: know what diseases are present in the region you are going to (malaria, yellow fever, typhoid, etc.) and get all the vaccinations and take your malaria pills.  Bring some drugs of your own; a good antibiotic for bacterial infection, some stomach meds, basic first aid stuff.  You will have stomach sickness while you're there, just avoid drinking water from the tap and eating fruits with skins and you'll be ok for the most part.  As far as other things; don't get caught without water ever, driving will be more dangerous there than here, but there's nothing you can really do about that. If you read up on where your going and keep your head on your shoulders you can travel "Africa" decently safely.  
[](/megustaperfect)
Agreed. And you can throw in eggs and vegetables and all sorts of other food in it to make it more gourmet and delicious. It's like having the crockpot experience without the crockpot!  &lt;3 Ramen :D
Yeah, in the UK, there's generally no added connotations when saying 'black', 'brown', 'white' or whatever shade in-between.  I don't often hear people saying 'blacks' though - it's generally 'black guys', 'black people' etc, although I don't think anyone would really care in  a normal context.
What do I need to do? Just connect the positive battery terminal to where the positive wire goes on the starter?
No.  Keep your crossovers out of my Star Trek.
I love the dark knight but "tis your birth and faith that wrong you, not I" just doesn't have the same ring as "Blame yourself... or God.."  and some of the name translations Barbaneth? seriously? ARRRGH
"BACK OFF STEDMAN, OPRAH IS MINE NOW! *MINE!!!*"  /god i wish chappelle would come back to the scene
FSM is only a theory. BDSM makes candy roll.
That metal thing sounds A LOT like a gamelan... Awesome.
I dunno, I'm from a union central PA college town living in Philly but I think you might be underestimating central Pennsylvanians.  EDIT: Statewide support was around 59% for at the end of 2009, lately I've been seeing "80% in favor" floating around... that's an encouraging percentage at any rate.
It looks like the huge creature from The Mist.
Sell it on ebay.
I think you're lost.  This is /todayIlearned.  You are apparently looking for /conspiracy.
and they should be kicking in about ..... now
I used to work at Hella Electronics in Flora, Illinois and it *was* hella lame...
Wait till you see the whites of their eyes...then flip, re-fire, and serve warm.
what store do you find these at?
SPDiag! 
I play everything but I will always identify myself as a PC gamer, but the mature audience is bullshit. I remember going to the college Internet Cafe back in the days of Counterstrike and Diablo 2 and it was full of this kind of shit...would get so bad I just brought a good pair of headphones. There was sometimes a sweetness though when playing LAN and then some fucker jumps out of his chair screaming and raging.
Amazing 
To be fair, given what she's gone through I think crazy eyes are appropriate.
It's a funny thing, there is this American chick from Ohio staying in the same place (I'm still not sure if it's holidays or work) and she's apparently very religious, even though her dad is anti-theist (that's what she told). We spent quite a while talking about ID and evolution but I still couldn't get an answer about what exactly she believes. She probably is starting to think that "God made it" is just as crazy as "it all started with a big bang". In any case, it was very fun, I've never met an actual "evolution is bullshit" christian before, we don't have any of those in Europe. In the end she just said "OK goddammit, enough, let's go to the beach" as I kept trashing every argument she would make (thanks r/Atheism for supplying me with reading information for the past couple years).  /true story
I think the point was he thought "oh hey, they bombed us, aint that some shit but now I have some cover for *accidentally* murdering my son!". 
It'd be easier if they had a tripod, keeps it stable while you focus through the window.
Long live Zapata and smartbeaner
I don't see what being an immigrant has to do with anything. I do the same as you but it is only because I won't laugh at terrible jokes on tv automatically like other people are and I don't like to talk about banal crap with people. I always just find something they are actually interested in and bullshit about that for a while
&gt; there is a few copies of a letter where she has to write to the family of a marine that died,just to save her life, under her command  You can save the said marine you know
It really would've been better had he used something more [conventional](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fj9OWEm_uSM)
Deer are pests in a lot of places anyway.
It's also possible that it has different meanings in each. Also just sayin'.
I'd say I hope he dies, but he is just a puppet.   When will the international community put an end to this oppressive theocracy?
All of the Mosins...*in the* **WORLD**.
Awesome!!! I was so hoping it was this song when i clicked on the link!
I love this repost!
Not as good as stove top. My roommate is just lazy and would rather throw it in the microwave for 30 minutes.
right on man. he is asking for more than a helping hand, now he just wants the arm too
PCI compliant will definitely be a market differentiator, even though it's more about how companies manage their own processes.  Many hosts don’t want to touch PCI data.   Don’t bother rewriting the sync protocol, just bundle existing software with yours (you will need to be careful about what you write on top of it so you don't have to release too much source).
&gt; Underpowered  No.
&gt;Orale'  FTFY
bloodbath is so fucking good. the fathomless mastery kicks soooooo much ass
yeah we know someone posted it on reddit last week
Though the Doctor did say that the suit has its own weaponry, and the suit at the lake didn't seem to be holding anything. My personal theory is that it's the little girl in the suit, and she somehow triggers his own regeneration to absorb the energy and save her own life.
Ambivalent is how I feel watching them. It's funny, but reminds me I'm single.
that's what she said
Check out Ginobili as he leads Spurs to game 7. Oh wait...
Maybe i'm misinformed, but I thought that was the only difference between a 6950 and a 6970 was unlocking the shaders and an overclock and flashing the BIOS to a 6970 accomplished that for you automatically?  
Left and just checked back. You're flagged as inappropriate. Gotta stop fucking swearing.
Although you sound like you work for google, I'm with you. When I switched providers I just told everyone to start using my GV number. The only thing I'm kind of bummed about is that the GV app is definitely not perfect and (correct me if I'm wrong) they don't have an API so that someone else could write an app.   Otherwise, I'm quite content using GV as my daily driver. ESPECIALLY when I'm outside of cell service, but inside wifi.   The only thing I'd like, and I said this in a comment in the market, is an outbox for texts. The package would be incredible at that point. 
iPhone: Twittelator FireFox: Echofon Chrome: ChromeBird
He meant the south of Wales.
HTFU?
That site shows how much a person or object is mentioned in the news. It's set to show Harper, Layton, and Ignatieff and how many times they were mentioned in the news over the last 30 days. Jack got a huge spike on the 12th, and strangely, another huge spike over the last couple of days. If you take in consideration all the [endorsements by the newspapers](http://www.reddit.com/r/canada/comments/h12xv/a_list_of_endorsements_by_newspaper/) over the last week including the rampant smear campaign going on against the NDP, it shows that someone higher up is freaking right the fuck out over losing their control.
Oh nos! The "free market" is hurting my business! 
Doesn't he have at least 50 more?
is an infant even self-aware at that point? those who suffer are the parents. so the loss of the child is a consequence of the parents actions - it sounds cruel, but the only guarantee in life is death. of course its a hard lesson to learn from, but learning is still better than just getting mad.
You don't need to punch a hole in anything. The 100 Roman soldiers are standing in a circle around you 500 m away. That means they're spread out over a circumference that's 2 * pi * 500m long. That's roughly 3140 meters. That means there's a Roman soldier every 31 meters. You don't have to punch a hole in anything to get through that on a dirt bike.
All I have to say is: Before divorce: my Parents argued. After Divorce: my parents argued through me and my sister. 
Yes I think so, but automatically :)  I'll ask Maciej to do a blog post.  Your best bet would probably to take the framework that the PySide has for generating it's Qt wrappers and having it output wrappers that work on PyPy, I think someone actually looked into that.
No more string!? Yes! and a sponge sounds so much more comfortable than a stick of cotton.  I have to try these
I'm not a singer, professionally anyway. But I did cry through an entire cheerleading audition in 5th grade. No sadness or depression, just sheer nerves/panic. Obviously I didn't make the team.
It's way more confusing from [this point](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OObV5DTf3Uc&amp;feature=player_detailpage#t=53s).
i just created a reddit account to say this but did anyone else notice that she probably has the saggiest breasts for someone of her age  [example](http://l.yimg.com/a/p/sp/tools/med/2011/04/ipt/1304186464.jpg)
Depends on what you're marketing to formulate a better strategy, and what kind of high competitive niche product/service you're working with.
Where did you get the Veritas Aequitas grips?  I. LOVE. Those.
Not affected. In fact I havent even heard about it.
just read this at a [4] while listening to "fly like an eagle" mind=blown
Please post as a reply to the track you are voting for. It makes it easier to count. Thank You
how will I meet this raven?
great so now dogs are better than me
Mathematician, Physicist, Chemist, Historian, Artist
[](/wat "")
For the 09-10 season I believe the Flyers actually looked into getting Esche to leave the KHL. It might've just been a rumor.  edit- yeah it was a rumor http://www.tsn.ca/nhl/story/?id=281691
...widely at that!
oh it was this guy
sweet, thanks
&gt;everything ... is a transition to the next state of that species.  As people usually use this kind of language, I'd say that this is definitely not true.  On the other hand, maybe you mean something different. 
Patience?  Can't say I have a ton of that.  I generally decide I want to do something and do it, no matter what it takes.  In this instance I had to sell my Trek Madone 5.2 bike for racing and am working on selling my desktop comp before leaving.  Abandon material possessions that are holding you back, acquire material possessions that let you be free.  In the end it's all just stuff.
&gt;Oncologists tend to think of cancer as a motley collection of cells gone berserk, but to me the way that tumours grow and spread to other organs indicates an organised and systematic strategy, designed to evade all that the body and the medical profession can throw at it. Such well-honed behaviour suggests they are the product of a long period of biological evolution.  What a self promoting little shit. I've done 2 years of cancer research at NCI with some of the best and brightest. They know exactly what they are dealing with, and the last thing they need is some layman to tell them what they've unknown for decades.  Edit: After I finished reading his bullshit article (with great difficulty), I feel like I should explain why it's such bullshit. There are 2 key concepts of cancer that he does not understand.  One, cancer is difficulty to treat because it's constantly mutating. Cancer cells will eventually develop resistance to any drug you can throw at them.  Two, cancer is difficulty to treat because your body's immune system recognizes cancer cells as "self", meaning they will not attack the cancer cells as they would as other diseases like bacteria or viruses.
Damn... I wasn't even aware half those words existed.
I don't know why people think this is so crazy. Hydrogen is a known fuel and water is made of hydrogen and oxygen. If you can release the hydrogen with less energy than you get from the hydrogen you release, you have free energy. The question is, how do you do it? This is intriguing, and I would love to think that there is some truth to it.
Yes, he was my puppies best friend at puppy school.
Dr. Manhattan.
That game is just mostly random chance y'know.  If my team makes a stupid mistake i'll probably just reload the last save game, make a few minor changes and try again.  Half the time the results just come down to utter chance.  WTF downvotes, really?  so i cheat at a video game, that just gets your moral panties in such a mess that you have to downvote me?  really?
I have rarely watched him play but his stats has always been top notch. Other than his first two years he has basically averaged a double double (20/10), seems to be an okay passer, etc. 
I thought it was funny, but that's subjective. I will agree that it was "too far" maybe, not for me, but for a large part of the audience and people not too used to South Park or unfamiliar with that movie (and apple fanboys lol). Definitely harder to watch than any other episode I can remember, but I think it will be just a one-time thing hopefully. Regarding your spelling, don't sweat it, It didn't hurt me physically as half of the shit I see on reddit does. Apostrophes are tricky to some people, and in some encodings they cause problems, so I'm used to see it that way. When in doubt, avoid it. It's better to not have it than use it everywhere, like it means "HOLY SHIT HERE COME'S AN S".
"pinching off a loaf"?  i honestly have never heard that one before
or an actual date, from the supermarket.
[Maybe it shouldn't bother you so much](http://blog.mrmeyer.com/?p=4646)?
Or real photo of an average girl.  
Taylor Swifts Music Video?
Why don't you take a seat...
"To those whom much is given..."  [pause for dramatic effect] "... much is ahsked."  I'm not sure if this sentence is even grammatically correct.  This is the best line of dialogue they could pull for the trailer?  Seems like they're trying hard to play to the "OMG freakin' badass warp porn legitimized by European accents!" tween male demographic.
Lets not encourage them. 
I'm from the rustbelt.  I'm still waiting for the high tech industries to come.  
The food!  There is always something free to do/see. The weather (mostly).  The scenery in the city and everything that surrounds it.  I have plenty of gripes with the city, though.  You may want to consider those as well. 
Every time I stay at a hotel I sleep like the dead. I have no idea why.
This was a couple weekends ago, only just thought to post it now! Just a picture of him with his certificate, since it was crummy weather during, so only one pic from during the actual test.   This summer his breeder invited us up to their place to do some more herding training! I highly suggest fellow herding breed owners get their dog herding instinct tested, it's awesome to see how they react to the sheep! :)
"THIS IS SO MESSED UP. I DON'T... WHAT IS HAPPENING. MY FEET... I GOTTA KEEP MOVING, THINGS AREN'T MOVING THOUGH? IT MAKES NO SENSE. WHY ARE THEY HOLDING ME IN THE WATER. WHAT IS THIS. THIS MAKES NO SENSE. I'LL KEEP DOING IT FOR FOOD THOUGH. PLEASE FEED ME AFTER THIS. FEEEED MEEEE."
For the first time in my life I logged in to Reddit just to upvote someone.  
If you are so inclined you can set up a box to do exactly this at home (that presuposes your 'home' isnt in china) really quite easily, their are tutorials for both windows and linux doing this also means you can store all of your data outside of china too and is more secure as you can use encrypted networking.
Grandma's Boy, one of my favorite stoner flicks
When I was 9 I had a dream/(NIGHTMARE) that I was in the car with my mom driving along the interstate and suddenly there was a truck in front of us with a little girl standing on the rear bumper with a chain around her neck. They hit a bump and the girl fell off and was being dragged behind it. Cars kept running over her. IT WAS TERRIFYING AND I WAS RESTLESS FOR THE NEXT FEW WEEKS and slept with my bedroom light on.   That's pretty much the only nightmare I've ever had, aside from the dreams about loved ones dying.
Note for the same price you can get a [variable ND filter](http://www.amazon.com/Fader-Variable-Neutral-Density-Filter/dp/B0031Q3822). I love mine. If you want to shorten depth of field out in the sun, this is one way to do it.
You cant do ANYTHING online with a PS3, bro.
You can help out too though right?  So, we're not in the best position right now but you can help correct that.  We're only here because we have done nothing.
How else are you going to put on a saucy puppet show? 
Doesn't mean we should tolerate it.
Hello, this looks very interesting! My minecraft name is:  maxmcleod  Thanks!
[He's got a fresh glass there for when the sun goes down.](http://imgur.com/wX6KC)
can't exactly remember how but it has to do with some mexican brewery bring the vienna lager style of beer back to life. it was either modelo or dos equis.
If God is understood to be a benevolent force which makes things right, then it's a bit obvious that that's the doctors. There's no force guiding the doctors, but the doctors are becoming God in a sense.
What would Jesus take?  Well, the going rate is 10%.
I don't know why, but that ms paint handdrawn caption made me lol.
lol it is a clothing store but the model toys and the sewing machine were just decoration. But you might be on to something there ;)
How would I feel if someone turned me left?
Katamari Damacy Theme Tune
Even though we all hate the westboro baptist church, this is exactly the kind of thing that we need to remember before we encourage people to work around laws to punish someone they don't like.   This is the product of both vigilante justice and police who think they are above the law (a minority, thankfully).
Time 2 by Ewan Dobson? Out in the middle of nowhere on my phone, so the YT vid is a no go. I recognize the Raiden hat tho. Mindblowingly amazing track. 
but I have no status in society. why pretend? 
Shit, they're onto us...
Didn't BW rectify this?
This is actually way more insulting. To get mere change and know you can't throw it at them sucks.  Ionno. I don't think I've ever done a bad enough job to warrant a stiffing (that sounds vaguely dirty) or a very miniscule tip.
I like this. It's very much just getting over yourself. We can't win them all and it's a great experience, losing. Note that being rejected most likely has the most to do with your shitty delivery and lack confidence, not what you appear to be. But it wouldn't hurt to hit the gym regularly and try to have a healthy diet. These alone do wonders for confidence. 
Hell yes finally! This is good stuff!
A tripod isn't very practical in small venue. A monopod is slightly more.  Handheld with stabilization is the most practical in this situation.   When shooting bands in a bar usually it is crowded and a photographer has to be fluid to compensate for the movement of the audience.  Also taking pictures from one vantage point makes for a limited number of pictures before exhausting all the options.  While extremely slow speeds are possible with a tripod, the subject is often in motion so that speeds under 1/15sec don't really help, making the tripod unnecessary.   When working in these conditions, there is a lot of shadow areas that makes high-ISO noise much more noticeable.   A flash can be used to greatly improve photos by making it possible to use lower ISOs (less noise), fill in the shadows (less contrast), use smaller apertures (greater depth of field) and freeze the action even when using a slow shutter speed.
Charlotte's Web, I read that so many times as a kid it was ridiculous.  On a related note, I tried reading The Owl and The Pussycat to my kids once (the book was given to us), and I couldn't finish it with a straight face.   'O lovely Pussy! O Pussy my love,     What a beautiful Pussy you are,      You are,      You are!  What a beautiful Pussy you are!'
I think that was pretty clearly bullshit from the get-go.  I mean all along that "we're preventing genocide" thing was kinda like "BUNNY!  Look out, it's coming right for us! *BOOM*"
what about cricket?
if we are going to list beings defeated by Dr. Who; The Time Lords...
Check out lenshero.com
Why the hell would your employer have the right to dictate your facial hair style?
Although GDP growth is mainly based on 2009-2010 data (and therefore affected by what could happen in that single year), I think there is a trend in here. Even if you put all developed countries with non-recession figures, the image will tell the same story.
I have fond memories of the foam ones based on WWII aircraft with the wind-up propellers from the ice cream man.  Shit, I even remember getting one of those huge Styrofoam gliders and attaching bottle rockets as jet engines... May we morn the loss of the souls on board that craft...
I swear his face keeps getting larger every time I see it.
This guy I work with does the whole surfer dude.  Except he can't quite pull it off and winds up looking like a middle-aged lesbian.  And he hasn't made the connection between his outfits and older women hitting on him.
you're
Twins named Leif and Mimosa.
[](/ok "danke!")
Fun fact: I've been selected for jury duty 10 times. I guess they pull your record or something because I've never once been summoned. 
Let me guess! Parnell street in Dublin? 
About 1200. I usually end up snacking on roasted seaweed or having more coffee, so I end up pushing over that. :)  
No complaints, never. I asked my ex if he could feel it and he said yeah, a lil bit, but that it had no effect on his enjoyment. I suppose ymmv depending on the shape of you and your partner's anatomies, but my good experiences have been echoed by other women I've spoken to.  I just like the Instead cup all-around, though on heavy days I wear it with a pad because sometimes it does spill.  Real tampons always leaked too though, so I think I'm just shaped weird.  Who knows. I like it best.
Donald Trump exploding on me would be terrifying indeed.
I'm pretty sure that she would tear your cock clean off with that vag.
Jesus Titty Fucking Christ...   *picks up jaw*
Oh, I thought you meant it was anti-abortion propaganda or something.  That kinda makes sense I guess (they do have to go back in time to when Gygas was weaker after all). 
I know this has nothing to do with anything, but I have to (based on your username). http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bVp1ybgqKrY
Seriously. He was quickly denounced after his death by even the Bolsheviks.
My thoughts eggsactly. He knew that if he said he drove drunk he would have gotten downvoted into oblivion.
Only from the perspective of the people who were never going to bother becoming educated about it to begin with.  What about all the people that call it techno? Do you go around huffing and puffing that they are WRONG and they should become educated about it? Or do you just live your life, listening to the dubstep that has and always will have the culture and meaning that it always had like an adult?
 Peace under one term he *knows* the rebels or the West will never accept - that this mass-murdering dictator remains the head of the Libyan state.
Should I be ashamed that I own the US editions, the UK editions and the UK adult editions? Not to mention random books from the set in 8 other languages.   The cover art from around the world is amazing.
There are still more Dragon types than there are Ghost
No, we're *taming* it, not *releasing* it!
I thought that was kind of funny. Who brings two monitors to a LAN party?
[8]
I doubt he paid the price on the tag knowing him  http://www.youtube.com/user/sharkzf6
I feel sad for the dog
I was thinking it might work for politicians. It would certainly make them think twice about smear campaigns.
While the "J" in "JRPG" does refer to "Japanese", the country of origin of the game in question has little to do with the actual genre of the game itself.  JRPGs have turn based combat where the focus is blow-by-blow die roll outcomes as opposed to SRPGs which add a strategic movement and positioning element to combat to expand individual encounters.
I skipped over that section, still haven't beaten it and I want a surprise.
This is my favorite debate ever. Combines two of my favorite things and is nothing but entertaining.
no, I wouldn't. are you some kind of moron? I've made that clear. What I'm saying is that everybody gets stuff that way- the very root of ownership is flawed. It's all stealing. hence my reference to our capitalist society.  screw it.
This just goes to show...Yao Ming is awesome in all regards.
I think you're getting the order of things wrong.  These people don't fight because people pay them.  They fought and trained when they weren't getting paid.  They did it because they enjoy it.  Who are you to decide they shouldn't do this?  Unlike rape, where one party is obviously unwilling, this is a consensual activity between two adults.  
What?  I am not going to sit here and tout the supremacy of Line 6 over everything else out there, but Line 6 make some good stuff, and I am happy I have purchased the Line 6 stuff I have.  I don't need every model of guitar amp and set up out there, but it is nice to know that if I need it, I have the ability to model it.   P.S. My Line 6 PODX3 plays wonderfully through my tube amps...  Rock on!
can someone re-host the image has been deleted. &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Yea, its this ranch in Oahu that use to be an air force landing strip and a bunch of other stuff.  Its crazy there a whole mess of movies have been filmed there
&gt;Atlas shrugged, and The fountainhead   I didn't realize my 7th grade English assignment was a college level assignment after all.
come off it you tosser, I was just fucking around
...and players who care too much about how other people enjoy the game. Apparently.
Because in and out is only on the west coast.  They have not krispy kremed themselves yet.  Which is probably a good thing, since five guys expanded everywhere and I have a feeling they won't exist in a year.
Ha, I get your point, and I knew about those myths, I was thinking more along the lines of fantastic creatures, I guess. Chimera and griffins and whatnot.  Luxray is kind of a crappy lion though, it's like saying Charmeleon is a good chameleon, when clearly Kecleon is a "true" Charmeleon.
I couldn't be friends with a Conservative.
damn, for a second there I thought there was going to be Rex Kwon Do happening. *Take a look at what I'm wearing, people. You think anybody wants a roundhouse kick to the face while I'm wearing these bad boys? Forget about it. Last off, my students will learn about self respect. You think anybody thinks I'm a failure because I go home to Starla at night? Forget about it!*
I don't think so, it sounds like it comes from a more rural part of Norn Iron.
If ever there was a time for strip poker, I would assume this is it.
This woman has been through enough to play that "what if" game now.  She did what she thought was the right thing when she was vulnerable, young, and violated; I doubt she looks back on it and thinks, "if I'd only gone to the local authorities when every other authority I went to merely brushed me aside, I would have gotten justice."   Being as rape, especially gang rape, is emotionally charged, and that our justice system is notoriously problematic in dealing with these types of crimes, I don't blame her one bit for pointing out the many hoops she had to jump through. That said, she does speak of the local police as being helpful and doing their jobs when she came to them, and luckily was able to prosecute her attacker in a state with no statute of limitations.  Her choice to continue pursuing justice in this case does urge victims to seek help--that's what she did as a college student (to no avail) and what she did 20 years later when she called the police and said "press charges."
A college degree is really a piece of paper that says "this person is focused, intelligent and willing to learn" it doesn't necessarily pen you into that career forever. Money isn't everything but it is something especially when you don't have any.  Do you think you could be happy doing the stuff you like on the side rather than full time and ensuring financial security at the same time? If not follow you dreams buddy! Go get it!
Hardly. I've paid for my hard drive. How I arrange the bits on it is none of your business.
FTA: "The Obama administration may not be lending arms to dissidents in the Middle East, but it is offering aid in another critical way: Helping them surf the web anonymously..."  So we let them do that which we take for granted everyday. Let them taste freedom and let them decide if it's worth fighting for. 
its been unfair ever since they added Matchmaking and reduced the price on HoN accounts...
I'm simply saying that life, uh, finds a way.
In the [first article](http://www.slate.com/id/2292312/) he writes that they account for racial and regional language tendancies.
Oh. Well crap. It was clogged, though...maybe that helped. God, these prebugs are so hard to open up. Thanks.
I really like cats.   I grew up with 2 cats in house at almost all times. I am really not a dog person.  When people aren't looking, I baby-talk to my cat.  Also, nothing beats a good snuggle up to a warm, soft, purring kitty.
...I hope that was typed with sarcasm...
Wait, what happened?
I bought this game on release when I was like twelve. It was as hard as balls, but the creatures you could create were bad ass. It kind of makes you feel like a Nazi scientist.
I'd say... 2.x languages. If you're American, force yourself to learn Spanish at least. With a good knowledge of spanish, you can make some sense of signs in Spanish, French, Italian and Portuguese. I can read all of those now to some extent.
Some other guy's username in a screenshot of an online game of Myth in MacAddict magazine eons ago.
Wiki article was deleted.
I recently found my old savegame files for this, and [these](http://imgur.com/Ko20E) [screenshots](http://imgur.com/ZEa1F). What is this I don't even...  The [RockPaperShotgun](http://www.rockpapershotgun.com/2009/02/11/forever-young-the-tragedy-of-bloodlines/) retrospective is also a good read; I keep meaning to play it again and try the community patches, but then I think about the hotel and go into the fetal position and cry...
TIL about FireHOL - thanks for the link, kekala.  It looks interesting.
Just about to finish up freshman year for engineering and I can tell you that the only thing I've ever used my graphing calculator for is simple math that you can do on any standard calculator. You cannot use a calculator on tests in Calc 1, 2, 3 or Intro to Differential Equations. Try out your first year with the calculator you have and then see if you need to upgrade it later.
Yes, yes I do.
i did not say one way or the other. i expressed a possibility. it is good to be cautious about what [people](http://thinkprogress.org/wp-content/uploads/2006/05/bushmission2.jpg) say  especially during a war.
yeah, I was pretty happy to find someone to go along with it
I appreciate the advice, but I think if I were to add two boxes where I reconcile my baseless paranoia with reality it would no longer be absurd or somewhat humorous. Made it for the lawls.
Plane, not jet like Eighter mentioned.  Private planes aren't expensive, private jets are. They have much higher maintenance and fuel costs than a typical propeller plane.
http://www.firstrowsports.eu/   it's mostly american feed but you might be able to get the Canadian cbc stream as well
The World Ends with You  I want that studio to make a sequel. Not necessarily TWEWY2, but rather the Perfect Dark to our Golden Eye.
[Shit just got real.](http://cdn.videogum.com/files/2008/11/qqmiigy92qu.jpg)
Alternate caption: "I don't always ask for money, but when I do, I always ask for money."
Keep on! I have to keep reading! 
lol. My older sister does this thing where she lays down on her back on the ground, and throws her arms above her head and lifts her body up off the floor. She walks on all fours backwards, just like that, swinging her head back and forth. It's the most sickening thing ever. Sisters can be creepy. :C
Liberals socialists? lol.
This baby is fucking ugly but it works for Bruce Willis' voice.
Laptop has an AMD Athlon Dual-Core QL-65.  1.5GHz.
Honestly, I just looked at the pictures and thought it was the same picture twice. Then I went ahead and read the rest of the article before examining them.
Meh, they have some good content, but if you just go there randomly, instead of having a particularly good article specifically brought to your, attention most of it is mediocore.
Just Cause 2 for Viva pinata?
Smartest answer
No, I literally mean carrot, like the big penis-shaped orange veg. As a horny teenage boy I always felt short-changed by the fact that vagina-shaped objects were harder to come by than the penis-shaped ones that nature gifted to women. I fucked shaving foam in an empty toilet roll carton, which kinda stung, and even considered the old 'raw meat packed into your mum's shoe' strategy but gladly can tell you I never went that far.   tl;dr yes i mean carrot
I know what you mean about the side bar, it takes a while to get accustomed to the language and details. Try taking them as starting points - search for more info on the details that interest you - and revisit them every now and then to see how you've come on.  There are some more elementary guides out there on the web. I like [this one](http://harrisonfjord.com/style-cheat-sheet-1/) a lot.  How much are you looking to spend, and what would you like to buy? Could you give an outline, per item?  Edit: re: poor man's guide. No, you've not missed a post. There's an ongoing back-and-forth in mfa between people looking for cheaper items and those insisting that quality is worth investing in. For example, it's often argued that an expensive pair of shoes will last 10x as long as a pair that cost a quarter of the price, and so cost is lower even though the price is higher.  There's a cost/time/quality tradeoff with clothes. If you need great clothes right now, it will cost. If you can wait for sales and don't mind thrifting, you can get great clothes in time at reasonable prices. If you've got to have them now and they have to be cheap, you'll usually be sacrificing quality.
I'd rather be on Schwab. Way more relaxed. I can even walk on the grass here!
Don't forget the best Sting / Atlus collaboration: Dokapon Kingdom.  Actually, I have yet to find a Sting developed game that I did not care for, and if it weren't the same for Virtual Hydlide (I suppose it's "so bad it's good"), I could say the same of Atlus' publishing streak.
This is far a few reasons: A) Newspapers are now an old fashioned and fast dying media form. Exposure from the internet has been like talkies heralding the end of silent movies. Because they are old fashioned, they are more likely to hire people with such a mindset and operate in an old fashioned way. This equals conservativism.  B) Most of the media in Canada is owned by a few huge corporations, and they shill for the most pro-corporate party, which is the Conservatives. It's interesting to note that this list of endorsements for Harper reads like a Postmedia newspaper roster. Newspapers owned by Postmedia that also endorsed Harper include: National Post, Calgary Herald, Edmonton Journal, Ottawa Citizen, Windsor Star, The Province, and Vancouver Sun. That's just a single media empire putting it's weight behind Harper.
[http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TevQS4qgE_Q](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=TevQS4qgE_Q)
he's using it ironically, to parody the rampant misuse of the word. he's many steps ahead of us
The Japanese government is saying it is okay for the kids to receive 20 mSv for the year while the recommendation they are referencing suggests that optimally the exposure remains at the lower end of 1-20 mSv. Let's say that should be &lt; 10 mSv. Then, in this case, the Japanese government should make the internal recommendation to its citizens that this is the outdoor + classroom limits to stay under 10 mSv. The government should not expect the citizens to extrapolate the math from 20mSv down to 10mSv. Even more so when they do not even mention that while 20mV is the upper limit, the recommendation is to limit exposure to be much less than that.  The government is exaggerating the safety of the situation to downplay the problem. Or rather, government recommendations are assumed to be cautious. Obviously not many people are going to stay 16 hours in a classroom and 8 hours outdoors. That's not the point. The government should recommend a maximum exposure lower than the limits - this let's others feel more confident in the government's recommendations and intentions.
I have no idea what "the system" Gliebert is referring to. Is "the system" socio-cultural tradition(s), government(s), economic conditions, or a combination thereof? Not a single link or citation just vague complaints at "the system". 
I suggest that we start by invading their [Facebook page](http://www.facebook.com/Paramount?sk=wall)
A little reading, however. http://blogs.hbr.org/hbsfaculty/2011/02/in-accusing-microsoft-google.html
I think I got how he did it.  He put the pants first facing the east and west directions.  Then he took his shirts and placed them in the directions of south and north one on top of each other.  Then he did it in reverse, flipped one of his jeans into the shirt and then tucked the shirt underneath and then he tightened it down.  Yup, exactly like a boss...
If this is real, then its lovely news.
The article dropped the ball by not mentioning that Craig argues that it was the *Israeli* soldiers that were brutalized by the command to murder innocent women and children.   Sick.
NATO said they weren't specifically targeting Gadhafi but it seems they are, this was said to be a precision strike.
This is the most douchebaggy thing I've ever read. Why does it have so many upvotes?
what is this?
It's not as bad as one of mine which said "angry lobotomized marmosets will circumcise you with rusty pliers."
Agreed.
/r/stalking
My IGN: ICTHPmalcsFTW
Yeah, I figured I'd offer it up for free before throwing it out. 
The comic was good, but the fact that you call your mother a bitch is disappointing.
Once you watch all three then you have a problem :)
Winter? Come back so I can see this in real life kthx!
yo it's cool you can say "shit" here
Don't worry.  Expelling razors out of your ass is just a technique to make you more manly.
Try:  Elbow: The Seldom Seen Kid  Elvis Costello: The Delivery Man, The Juliet Letters  Bruce Hornsby: Spirit Trail  Chris Thile: How To Grow A Woman From the Ground  The Shins: Wincing the Night Away  The Magnetic Fields: Distortion  Jonsi: Go  Edit: Forgot Dr. Dog. 
... that's the joke  His joke is that he pretended to not get the joke.
Insert snarky anti custom map off-shoot community remark here.
Very nice work!
i am afraid i'm not familiar with that rule. could you clarify?
Some people learn the hard way.  I hope they blow all their fucking money, because maybe that harsh reality will shock them out of it.  It's sad that people get taken advantage of, but it was their choice in the end to believe in the fairy tale.  That said, their financial statements show donations are virtually unchanged since 2003, while they've reaped windfall profits in investments.  So it could very well be that the followers of this doomsday cult aren't as financially invested as we think.  
I am not an expert but...  Robustness - it's either 1 or 0 - little room for error and any errors can be checked easily.  Universality - There are a lot of easy ways to represent 1 and 0. 
I read this in his voice!
Bullshit. Nobody defeats [me](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Herpes_simplex_virus#Latent_infection).
Never knew Nanny Ogg was a redditor.
Agreed
At first I was like, "Cool! A ghost story!"  Then I was all like-- **D:**
This theory does not take into account, age, amount of items, wealth, will power, cashier experience, drug use, % of complaining or anything else. The elderly pay with fucking change cause they don't trust cards, and they like giving correct change so they have to open two slots in their purse/wallet. A single mom with children is going to take equally as long, as her children fight for the candy at the register, and she struggles to comprehend everything around her because she is on her 3rd valium for the day. Then theres the asshole who will complain and argue about anything (either gender). In addition theres the flirt, who will take valuable seconds. Finally the decent shopper, who pays in a single note, or card and has fewer than the max amount of items for that lane who will spend very little time as they are not rushing to gtfo but indeed have no desire to waste away in a line at the supermarket. Admittedly there are combinations of these, however in a place where 5 checkouts are open I can easily deduce which is going to be the fastest, and complete my shopping journey much faster than the lady sitting in the other lane wondering how I managed to progress at a rate of three customers faster than her. When it comes to capitalism, the only true socialist act is making a single lane. I avoid those shops at all costs.
I'm leaning a little more towards getting it written in a foreign language and convincing someone it means something deeper to the point where they get it as a tattoo... but your idea is good too.
Like calling someone a nazi because of a harmless picture on the internet?
Fuck this. Killing innocent children is inexcusable. 
All my favorite things rolled into one. Damn.
damn you.
Downvote? Really? You cut me to the quick, thou vile and callow naves!  Edit: I take it all back!
Yes, we are. It's sort of why this subreddit exists.
"and tore down say, a third of them, in a matter of seconds"  The rest of them are likely to shit themselves while throwing their javelins on the ground with their shields and running away as fast as they could as they would never have conceived of such a thing even being possible.  You would be godlike to them.  Many battles back then when one side sustained 40% or 50% casualties over the course of the battle they'd withdraw.  One person inflicting 30% casualties in a handful of seconds would cause their brains to practically explode from cognitive dissonance.
I demand to see this man's birth certificate; word is he was born in Canada.
I know that was the idea at the time, but... saying a word in every episode does not make an Arc.  "Bad Wolf" in year 1 and "Torchwood" in year 2 are not in the same class as year 5's slow reveal of the exploding TARDIS causing the crack... not to mention who was it saying "Silence will fall" when River was in the TARDIS.
"Just go with it" is kind of my mantra in general with meditation. If you're trying to do things, you're probably going to keep getting frustrated. The best meditations I've had involved me just sitting back and observing myself. The song will probably stop once your mind fulfills that part of whatever it's trying to do. If not, just go with it. 
If you have been with T-Mobile for a while and want a cheaper data plan, call them and tell the automatic phone system "cancel." This will take you directly to level 2 customer care and they are your best friends. Ask them for the "preferred" data plan. It is 20 dollars a month instead of 30 and still retains all the functions.
That's a pretty retarded thing as, in general, women do not have beards. 
The [Green Line](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Green_Line_%28Israel%29), then.
And *anyone who understands politics* and doesn't want to sound like an arrogant know-it-all would know that Liberal support is collapsing more slowly in Toronto than anywhere else in Canada, and that Toronto is likely to wind up the most Liberal place in the whole country next Tuesday. The Montreal Gazette is endorsing the Conservatives, who won't come any higher than third in a single riding on the island, so obviously not everyone backs a winner. Le Devoir is endorsing the collapsing Bloc. Why? *Because that's what they always do*, just as reliably as the Sun always goes Tory and the Star always... well, until now anyway.
Those are just necklaces. They are not the rings your lady intends to wear for the rest of her life, as a statement to the world that not only do you love her, but that you are worth buying something uniquely for her.   Though that's kind of cold too. Did you at least get them in different colors?
I have no frame of reference, what is a challenge course program?
Doctor killing himself? The universe would collapse, end of time itself, etc etc.
Actually scripts can have malicious code depending on what bot you are using. RSBot gives (or used to at least, not sure now) public access to the login class, so any script can just grab your details.
Going through it right now... annoying.
Yeah, I'm actually sitting on a literal mountain of cocaine as I type. Cracked spends most of its money on the Sherpas that guide me and other freelancers to the top of these mountains in order to get to our computers.
thanks for the response!
It is not MSNBC or CNN's fault those Birthers and their signs showed up at all those Tea Bagger rallies these past 3 years.  It is not these networks' fault that all those Birther sites are on the internet.  These networks are not to blame for Orly Taitz's Birther lawsuits.  Blaming MSNBC and CNN for Birther relevancy merely  twists *cause and effect* in order to support a *confirmation bias*.   
I don't agree:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yiLLQ8sxOL4#t=0m19s
well which voice do you read it in?  I hear King Arthur when I read it.
Hahah thank you. =)
They are actually changing the USMC pull up standards to make it higher for females. Also, all male marines are sexist.
Comment one: "Give me an example when you were watching fox news and they lied to you." Comment two: "Iam not saying Fox News hasn't lied."  I think at this point, I can put you to rest. Sorry I don't argue with crazy.
I feel (remember) your pain.  Now I can't sleep because I'm alone.  Just think of him, you'll drift off soon enough.  Always worked for me/her/us.
nice phone specially for gamers, but not exactly damn good phone. i Like XPERIA arc instead.
For my junior prom, told this girl that I was seeing who went to another school, that my parents weren't letting me go to prom, so we couldn't go anymore.  Took another girl instead.
When?
wtf is the caps lock button about?
Yeah, I mean, I was just wondering if it was a serious issue or not. I'm not concerned too much performance-wise. I was actually pretty content with it at the stock speed, but thought: "why not?"  I think i'll try lowering the voltage and see what that yields.  As for the RAM, I want to say no because I ran the memtest with no errors. Is there any other method for testing RAM?
You suffer from a severe case of woosh.  You say Hunt for Red October has no subs, when it is a movie about a sub.
Was that nolibs? Did he get a new round of accounts banned?
couldnt you use a cheap wifi adapter to easily get around it? Since it has its own mac address?  I wonder if someone makes a wifi adapter that has the ability to randomly change the mac address. I would buy one.
People will no clip.
It's called "innovation" when capitalists do it. 
Keto is not making your cholesterol go up.
Buy a new one, return the broken one and complain it's broken.
I agree... Aside from the occasional random post, I really don't mind the way things are now.  I've learned quite a bit from this sub. I really don't care that much one way or another about the production aspect of creating music.  All the technical talk goes right over my head.  I do, however, really enjoy the discussions about the creative process, and I love having input from knowledgeable people on the occasional question or two I may have about the business. Either way, I thought a reminder about r/Songwriters might benefit at least a few people.  
If the higher costs of oil make exploiting far-off cultures less profitable, maybe they wont be so readily exploited.
The problem with this is once you start developing your own security model, unless you know EXACTLY what you're doing (and even then!) you will introduce your own security holes.  The reasoning behind using the Linux Kernels own permissions system is that you gain all the eyes and work from the linux kernel community without introducing your own problems.  This works fine, people just need to quit being idiots.
only redditors would notice this.
Who has two thumbs and does it up the ass?  This guy.
Dropbox shared folder.
your jizz napkin has inspired me to become an artist myself
[Indeed.](http://www.reddit.com/r/sweden) 
I hope this doesn't/does start a new Erlang fanboyism among the geeks. :D
They should give birth about every 18 months ideally, although that can easily become 24 with some individuals if they don't get pregnant. Cows have a gestation period of 9 months.  No longer mind the meat because it was a byproduct of farming and eventually it seemed ridiculous to purchase protein for me when it was readily available outside my door. This coupled with personally knowing the animals made meat much more palatable Now I eat meat but only if I know where it came from, be it our farm or a neighbor etc. and feel comfortable with quality of life/slaughter. That being said Eating an animal that you raise, and kill is a really really weird experience, one which I think should be had by all chosing to eat meat. As for relationships, yes attachments are formed with all of them although the level of attachment varies between individual cow. As for keeping them after they stop calving, that does not happen. When they can no longer produce milk we can no longer afford to keep them and they go off to slaughter, except for maybe if there is one particular cow which we are all fond of, then we keep it around because it has become more of a pet if that makes sense.  hope that was clear
So where the fuck did the girl go?
Boooooo
Yes. He is overrated, but still enjoyable. Not much content, but still he has entertainment value. And I like to think he is less of an ass than Kanye. Let's give it time.
what?  is that even a real sentence?
God Dammit I wanna wear a skirt all the fucking time.  I wouldn't even own a pair of pants.
Oddly enough, much of my hate for these types of posts (along with "No THIS is the greatest comedy duo of all time" or "EATING TACOS [FIXED]") is because I spend time on the new tab. 
The longer term implications are for restrictions on the absolute right of sovereign nations to defy the will of the global community.  That's why authoritarian states such as China and Russia are uncomfortable with the process.  I'm personally quite comfortable with the international community stepping in when a dictator is slaughtering his people.  There's plenty of places where that looks like hypocrisy - Syria being an excellent example currently - but there's no reason not to take on the easy cases at least. For the time being Syria is in a much more unassailable position.
Yeah, I agree with you.  It does suck if all you want is a time keeping device. I guess we almost need another term for what the OP is looking for.  I say "Wrist Enhancement Device."  On a side note, [have you looked into these](http://www.amazon.com/Crosse-Technology-WT-5220U-Projection-Temperature/dp/B001JQX0MO/ref=pd_sxp_f_pt)?  Just pulled a random model.  They don't make the one I use anymore.  You'd have to research them a bit to find a good one.  Mine projects on the ceiling in a 2x4 ft. block.  If you travel, I could understand it being a hassle to take with you, though.  I use it at night and it makes it really easy to see the time and isn't very bright.
why would you wear something that needs to be dry cleaned to tug of war?
He will be compensated just as much. The people who would pay **still will**, the people who don't pay **never would have anyway**.
As far as I'm concerned, you're either doing science, or you're just making shit up.
May 8th
Jigglypuff and some earmuffs
Cool idea ahahah
This level of lurking can only be accomplished with serial killer mentality.
Agreed. Wholeheartedly.
I'd say trolling is subtler than satire.  The opinions they claim to hold are usually much more clearly refutable, but their apparent vehement belief in them makes it more difficult to discern reality. Edit: compare Swift's Modest Proposal (or a Colbert episode, for contemporary comparison) to a (professional-grade) troll's comment.
Chainsaw and a BOOOOOM STICKKKKK!
With the total number of possible games of chess being something like 10^ 1050, computers are a loooooooooooooong way off from being anywhere near that capable  FTFY
The moment I saw a thread celebrating the vandalism of a church I knew I was over that subreddit.
The G20 has overwhelming firepower and isn't shy about using it. Mass international organizing while holding them off with guerrilla warfare is really the only way to go. Armed resistance alone only maintains a bloody stalemate like in Afghanistan.
Not as simple as system font http://www.imgur.com/l4uQD.jpg
That was my point... Who knows what the farm's books look like, but in other businesses, a lot of tines the owner is an employee and is on the payroll
Cause having a half-life is not fun. Neither is having 8.5 ;)
you can definitely get work here without a visa, I've heard/know of a few people that have done it this way. Although normally that is just to make some extra money before moving on. Staying for a whole year you might have a bit more trouble but you should be fine. Many restaurants and fruit pickers rely on backpackers.  There's also the option for a farm-stay. Some farms allows you to stay and eat for free but you need to work on the farm, so its not easy going but could do it from time to time.  We get so many backpackers that there's even sites up to help get jobs. [Example i just found](http://www.backpackerjobboard.com.au/about/) So you shouldn't have to much of a problem, except Australia can get rather expensive.
As a transplant, I'm amazed at how good Utah's public transit is as compared to its population. I commuted to Weber in Ogden from SLC via the UTA and by driving to a parking lot alongside a Frontliner stop I only added 20-25 min to my commute time, but easily saved hundreds of dollars in gas throughout the semester.   A bus ride to the U of U is not more than 30 minutes for most places in SLC. While you wait, you do homework and not only save money and hassle, but increase your GPA.
Here's the thing, a lot of First Nations people *have* received "terrorist" training.  From my home town I know of at least two guys who went to south america in the seventies and eighties for training, and I've been told by several people that some of the Metis leadership (I'm Metis) in Manitoba did the same thing.  There was a long period of time when many people felt that the government had no intention to honour the treaties and that the conflicts between the government and Native organizations were going to escalate to armed conflict, and many people or groups prepared for this.  I know that the MMF provided financial support to AIM, and that the RCMP had informers in the organization, and vice versa.  Given what was going on around the time (think the situation surrounding Dudley George) "Native Canadian Groups" considered the U.S. as a definite terror threat and prepared.
&gt; All caused by poor diet.   No it's not. The majority is but high blood pressure isn't only caused by diet.
Which one has the minigun on it?
Congratulations!
Which movie? Looks like a Half-Life antlion or something.
I was talking about the May incident that you brought up, where a friend of his was driving his car with drugs and ammo.  The sexual harassment charge was dropped by the way. I don't condone that.  If he did it, that sucks.  As far as the other things....  he drove his car fast and smoked some weed?  Oh my god!!!  Somebody alert the White House!
Shirley MacLaine in the Apartment.
A fighting one you weak bastard.
[Wat?](https://support.steampowered.com/kb_article.php?ref=5477-WPJM-9388#ps3steam) And I meant PC to PS3 on the same copy.
When you really think about it actually seems plausible. 
it will leave her with a warm and jizzy feeling
.... Perhaps a way to lead animals around... a trail of sugar!
If you think that's bad you'll love this. [Christina Hendricks](http://imgur.com/mqbUM) is married to [Geoffrey Arend](http://imgur.com/b6WUd)
I like how, almost automatically, the first reply is a condemnation of a perceived slight. Despite the fact that it's so utterly simple that there is no implication of malevolent *or* benevolent intentions. It is merely benign. But thanks for your knee-jerk reaction, it reaffirms my faith (or lack therein) of humanity.
Haters gonna hate.  You look great and you're obviously working hard.  Keep it up, girl!
ICE has saved me a shitload of work recently. And it's free.  
Agreed.  I can't think of a time when I was so upset about the loss of a relative or pet that my instincts told me to post it on Reddit.
She took shelter in the bathroom; seemed to do the trick, although I would probably have gone to a downstairs neighbor's place myself.
How do you suppose that? Can you do that today with previous types of digital storage?
They're not hating on him because he OD'd. They're pointing out that dying of an OD isn't exactly what you'd call a "success".
Relevent  http://meanmassive.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/12/BreakingBad-episode-7-tv-review.jpg
I'm 24, male, 135 pounds, 5'10'.  I am thin and most people consider me to be in good shape. I just feel that I am soft, I have no muscles so I may be a tad flabby in places.  I deal with this by jogging. I would like to stay around 135 and have just a bit more muscle while getting rid of some fat. It also really elevates my mood.  If you decide to get fit you should do it regardless of what people say. Do it for yourself so you have a better body you can be proud of.
I'd put a dildo in my pussy. Sadly, it is frowned upon as a man. That, and I don't have a pussy. But it would be very girly if I did.
I earned a scholarship. If you can't afford it now you can go find a job and save up or you can try ROTC. None of this gives you the right to pay for it from someone else's wallet.
Thank you for the quick response! I was suicidal late last year, and came very close to going through with it. I understand the pain it brings, and I can only imagine what it is like for you. Just to clarify, the man you met and your current boyfriend are different people, right? Best wishes. 
The best intro programming textbook I know of is [How to Design Programs](http://www.htdp.org). I've taught from this textbook as a TA in the past (in courses with non-majors as well) and it's worked great. Though it uses a custom teaching language (a subset of [Racket](http://www.racket-lang.org)), the lessons it teaches transfer to other languages. In short, as the title suggests, the book aims to teach you how to design a program from first principles and not to teach you to program in any particular language. You're better off learning general principles in CS and you should focus on that over the choice of language.
Make a new thread to tell them it wasn't solved. 
That sounds great! Just contact me again if you decide to do so!
So explain to me again why the Silents (Silence?) needed people to go to the moon? Did the Doctor say that they did that only to get a spacesuit? Why did the need a spacesuit? Did they actually care about humans going to the moon? 
Linear does not equal bad.  Fuck off with that attitude.  If I wanted every game to be an open world copy/paste fest I'd be a Bethesda fan.
Not going to lie... Ogre Battle 64 was the shit.  Imma go remake that for PC. Brb.
every time i see this picture it always blows my mind. makes me feel really small
Both.  And neither.
Foreplay is playing with her forehead its obvious duh
Its a cool community college! Have fun dude, welcome!
I wish I could upvote more.
So, you've jumped off a bike going at a good rate of speed with absolutely no physical consequences? Maybe you're some kind of parkour or gymnastics phenom, but for the rest of us, jumping off a speeding bike is not something we can casually do safely and easily. 
"i've got 3 things to do, WELL, 4 things to do, WELL 4 things and a lizard"  ..something like that!
If my wife got a benign one I think we'd be laughing. No more condoms, no badgering a doctor into a vasectomy, no stupid family pressure to have kids. . . 
I'd heard that before. I believe it. I hate that song now. :)
How does this differentiate from going to, say, Slickdeals.net -&gt; Help Me Find A Deal forum, Amazon Discussions, or Fatwallet Deal Discussion, all of which have large established audienced bases?  I understand they are not focused on your specific niche but given their size the experience you can get from those communities are already quite good.  Quick thoughts after registering: Are you going to further incentivize users to provide good responses othr than the current epeen/karma metric -- say, products from sponsors, sweepstakes/prizes, or?  REALLY don't like the "viral" feature of "Ask a friend to answer" -- it's a clear reminder that you're mining our FB friend list using their API.  UI needs a lot of improvement.  Feels cluttered, noisy, and inconsistent in design.  Prolly should offer read-only access to nonusers... the reality of things is that a large percentage of Internet users are lurkers, and to block access to that doesn't seem to be good idea.   Anyhoos, good luck with your venture.
Hahaha, that was fucking brilliant.
You really got me
Very nice arse, we need to see more of you young lady...
Exactly. News flash: everyone, even "nice" people, can inflict hurt. The boogie monster psycho ex-girlfriend routine is usually a half-truth because they've failed to acknowledge and accept any mistakes they made during their relationships. Enabling shitty behavior is a mistake, forgiving a chronic cheater is a mistake, not being attentive about birth control is a mistake, being controlling, clingy, lying because they can't handle conflict, avoiding all conflict, failing to communicate needs, failing to express love, etc. No one is perfect all the time and in many cases, relationships fail because of miscommunication and value differences, not because one person is evil and the other is a white knight/fairy princess. I don't dispute there are both shitty men and women out there, I just can't believe every one of these emotionally unavailable nice guys is the product of an evil woman. Also, leading someone on is a douche move and is a pretty good indicator that the person is a wolf in sheeps clothing.  
That's democracy for you, right there.
That made my brain hurt and I finished it. I'm too dumb.
&gt; As to your question, perhaps because they're broke?  Perhaps they should spend less money.
Yep, lost my job because doing any work was just really difficult.
I really hope you don't see that man again! Sounds awful, definitely creepy. 
Oops, sorry, the first time I opened the link nothing below the break loaded. 
...  thanks.   (In all seriousness I couldn't help but laugh, thanks seriously.) 
That's fair. More to come in the future.
1. I had to go to my next class 2. because it was funnier to make them mad
A QUARTER? That's terrifying.
Honestly, Now that I read it, I'm more worried that the first thing to pop into my head after typing 'Jew' was 'Accountant'. 
Typography should be a gen ed requirement :)
Time-Pink Floyd--  all four instruments working in perfect harmony - especially during the part most people consider the "guitar solo." Listen to it 4 times, each time focusing on the respective instruments (guitar, bass, drums, keyboards)...PERFECTION!  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MYiahoYfPGk#t=3m28s
BFG9000 and one of those green heads that makes you invincible and see white
odd, its the opposite for me. Thought it was stupid when I was a kid, now I'm 20 (maybe some will say I'm still a kid?) and it looks "cool." Still don't smoke tobacco though
Well hopefully, for the dichotomy, the two meanings are the same, but clearly when we get to such things as "meaning" the definitions break down.
if we all get to vote in the end, i'll vote for forumotion too. i dont care abt the privacy... i love the smileys there and the display pics and the calming green UI.  who be u btw?  and who is forum_tester? are u from sulekha CH?
oh rlly?
1. Unsubscribe from /pics  2. Take a breather.  3. Reduce your douchebag factor by 78%
Yet another reason to be ashamed of living in Missouri...
I don't really know the answer to this question, but I have a friend who gets unemployment... and he lives with his parents without a care in the world, kind of gets at me, especially since I'm trying to make it on my own now.. I feel ya mang.
my thoughts exactly
Maybe when we die we'll get to fly around in that as ghosts.
"Dude, you need to see how fucked up you are. You say we must be humble, but command us to worship you or go to hell. That's not humble. You let terrible things happen to the people of the world, yet claim to be almighty and righteous. I'd prefer hell over worshiping you 24/7. I'm terribly sorry that I could not believe random stories written thousands of years ago over modern science."
Not buying a game makes you a whiny entitled child?   PC gamers are a demographic, in some cases one without a ton of influence, and boycotting a product while explaining why is one way to try and influence change. I didn't buy Crysis 2, but I will buy Battlefield 3. Is that whining?
Good answer. Thanks.
One thing I see a lot of people do against Zilean is run away when he puts a bomb on you. Don't do this. Do two things:  1) Hit him, hard. Running away isn't gonna make the bomb go away, you are gonna get hit no matter what. The worst thing you can do is let him get those bombs off for free.   2) After punishing him (Q+W), run to your creeps. If you bomb explodes on your creeps, his lane will push. He can't deny you at your tower and your jungle can gank him easy. 
Picture of killed Gadaffi son  http://previous.presstv.ir/photo/20110430/pirhayati20110430230358890.jpg
What a coincidence!  I often drink to me too!
Nothing quite like some delicious tree clams...
interview with jay-z
$100 a bed if it is full $80 if bed is empty + $3.19 a ton. 
Sadly, this may be helpful to him with the type of voters he's courting.  
Climate change exists with or without man, therefore, the issue is how man is shaping climate change, not creating it.  In standard practice, "anthropogenic" may be used to refer to Global Warming but is less commonly used to refer to Climate Change.  When referring to climate change, both are considered correct, sometime being used synonymously.
Dude, google yourself some "Josef Mengele" and make sure you have a bucket next to you so you can vomit. If you're playing devil's advocate with "We need to give him a fair trial!" like I think you are, you're not even being clever or anything by doing so. There are stacks of documents about what he himself has done and he would not have fled so far away if he didn't know what he did was the epitome of evil. There is no excuse for this person's behavior and frankly even giving him a trial would have been a waste of time.
I'm glad you did. I wouldn't have seen it otherwise. Btw, now there are 20,001
Fast job man.  Some bad ass under card fights.
The people you list are known and loved for extraordinary success in their official capacity, despite any personal problems they had. The difference between them and JPII is that I would contend he wasn't all that great in his official capacity.  The church would probably have him on the path to sainthood anyway, it's just ridiculous that they're breaking precedent by doing it A) so soon after his death and B) in the midst of the ongoing scandal that's a result of his irresponsibility.
What about his 13? I don't get it. 
Well, if that's bad, you haven't heard about the tearing and the pooping.
OK - Sorry I missed you. Anyway, let me know when you can trade again!
Cool!  And I will begin using this term immediately!  I had no way to describe myself with respect to this interest until now.  
Damn...  I was going to, but decided to skip cause I didn't know anyone was going.  I'll definitely go in the future, just need more notification!
This remix might give this kid a fighting chance! http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CeafoOhUawQ
Yeah, this is magical.
In an apartment building, the safest place is going to be as close as you can get to a load-bearing feature of the building near the center. A good example would be a doorframe or under a stairwell. 
o_0*anneurism
Hmm. How do porn stars and most women in general handle it?
EAGLE. (: Ravenclaw's mascot is actually an eagle. /supernerdmoment
&gt; Hahahahahahahahaha that's fucking disgusting, and there's no way you can tell me the war will be over if he's dead. The regime will fold like a house of cards without him.
I could only afford to gift you Mount and Blade Warband, but I have really been wanting to play Portal if there's a way you could just gift that.
Bombadil was nothing compared to those **FUCKING ENTS.**
I used to exactly like that, but after my ex-roomie tried to stab me in the neck during his bad trip I have lost that ability and have some slight PTSD from that.
I miss white castle so much.  The store bought kind just isn't the same.
The glitches in the [MLB games](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=INR4hQ8U948) are some of the funniest things ever.
what a great response!  Thanks for the info!!!
I did this for way longer than any adult should.
Chuck Norris......popcorn 
You're not very convincing.  A quick look at your profile page shows all.
Yes, you just don't touch those systems just to "hack in JSON". A converter/adapter is the sane choice. So, there's nothing wrong with a something-to-XML converter. The problem is what I've mentioned. That we need one.  Also, as other have pointed out, XML can be used for Good(tm), because you can create schemas and validate against them. And it's so-so self-contained. (Not that you couldn't come up with JSON-Schemas.)
Made cotton production non viable, and bankrupted cotton producers. This led to agricultural diversification, particularly the peanut, land redistribution and the end of the cash crop cycles the South was used to.  Edit; Just notices plbogen said the same thing. I replied to the orangred, no the comment
Hats off to you. That is the first thing i thought when i saw that article
This may not be *exactly* what you're talking about, but some research in [rejection sensitivity](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Social_rejection#Rejection_sensitivity) suggests that people who are highly sensitive to rejection will be more likely to interpret ambiguous situations as indications of rejection and thus sabotage their own relationships. It could be seen as one category of self-sabotage.
